CIK: 1409269
Company Name: VENUS CONCEPT INC 
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2022-03-28
Accession Number: 0001437749-22-007293


Item 1 Business. Overview Venus Concept Inc. (referred to herein, together with its subsidiaries unless the context otherwise denotes, as the Company, Venus Concept, us or we ) is an innovative global medical technology company that develops, commercializes, and delivers minimally invasive and non invasive medical aesthetic and hair restoration technologies. Our aesthetic systems have been designed on a cost effective, proprietary and flexible platform that enables us to expand beyond the aesthetic industry traditional markets of dermatology and plastic surgery, and into non traditional markets, including family and general practiti1rs and aesthetic medical spas. In the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, a substantial majority of our systems delivered in North America were in non traditional markets. In November 2019, we completed our business combination with Venus Concept Ltd., an Israeli corporation ("Venus Ltd."), and the business of Venus Ltd., became the primary business of the Company (the "Merger"). The Merger significantly expanded our presence and capability in the hair restoration market with the addition of the ARTAS System to our device portfolio. The ARTAS iX Robotic Hair Restoration System was launched in July 2018, which we believe is the first and only intelligent robotic solution to offer precise, minimally invasive, repeatable harvesting and implantation functionality in 1 platform. Through our NeoGraft device, which we acquired in 2018, we offer an automated hair restoration system that facilitates the harvesting of follicles during a follicular unit extraction ( FUE ) process, improving the accuracy and speed over commonly used manual extraction instruments. The ARTAS System complements our NeoGraft hair restoration system and allows us to penetrate a broader segment of the hair restoration market. Our hair restoration systems are sold primarily to plastic surgeons and dermatologists, although many of our customers come from other specialties in medicine. In addition to our hair restoration systems, we have developed and commercialized nine aesthetic technology platforms. Our product portfolio consists of the Venus Versa, Venus Legacy, Venus Velocity, Venus Fiore, Venus Viva Venus Viva MD, Venus Glow, Venus Bliss, Venus Bliss Max and Venus Epileve. We have received clearances from the FDA, for our aesthetic and hair restoration devices classified as Class II or greater by the FDA as described in greater detail in this Annual Report on Form 10 K. Outside the United States, we market our technologies in over 60 countries across Europe, the Middle East, Africa, Asia Pacific and Latin America. Because each country has its own regulatory scheme and clearance process, not every device is cleared or authorized for the same indications in each market in which a particular system is marketed. Venus Viva , Venus Viva (logo) ,Venus Viva MD, Venus Legacy , Venus Legacy (logo) , Venus Concept , Venus Concept (logo) , Venus Versa , Venus Versa (logo) , Venus Fiore , Venus Fiore (logo) , Venus Freedom , Venus Bliss , Venus Bliss (logo) , Venus Bliss Max , NeoGraft , Venus Concept (logo) , Venus Glow , Venus Glow (logo) , ARTAS , ARTAS iX , AIME , NanoFractional RF , Delivering the Promise , and (MP)2 are trademarks of the Company and its subsidiaries. Our logo and our other trade names, trademarks and service marks appearing in this document are our property. Other trade names, trademarks and service marks appearing in this document are the property of their respective owners. Solely for convenience, our trademarks and trade names referred to in this document appear without the TM or the symbol, but those references are not intended to indicate, in any way, that we will not assert, to the fullest extent under applicable law, our rights, or the rights of the applicable licensor to these trademarks and trade names. To address the financial barriers faced by physicians and aesthetic service providers, we focus our medical aesthetic product sale strategy on a subscription based business model in North America and in certain of our well established direct global markets. Traditional energy based aesthetic devices can require substantial financial commitments, where next generation products often launch within 18 to 24 months of purchase, making it financially difficult for aesthetic service providers to access the market newest technologies, and for providers in non traditional markets to justify the significant investment. Our subscription based model is designed to provide a lower initial barrier to ownership and provide customers with greater flexibility than traditional equipment leases secured through finance companies. This significantly reduces the upfront financial commitment, without 1rous credit and disclosure requirements, making this business model increasingly appealing and affordable to non traditional physicians and medical aesthetic spas. If the economic circumstances are appropriate, we provide customers in good standing with the opportunity to upgrade to our newest available or alternative technology throughout the subscription period. To ensure that each monthly payment is made on time and that the customers systems are serviced in accordance with the terms of the warranty, every product purchased under a subscription agreement requires a monthly activation code, which we provide to the customer upon receipt of each monthly payment. To support the growth initiatives of our customers, we have developed a customer business development program that provides the support and tools necessary for our customers to effectively launch, promote, and grow their businesses, while also supporting the sale of our products and ancillary services. These interactions help in further building our customer relationships. 4 Table of Contents As of December 31, 2021, we operated directly in 18 international markets through our 15 d irect offices in the United States, Canada, United Kingdom, Japan, South Korea, Mexico, Argentina, Colombia, Spain, France, Germany, Australia, China, Hong Kong, and Israel. Subscription Based Business Model We generate revenue under our subscription based business model and from traditional system sales. We commenced a subscription based model in North America in 2011 and, for the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, approximately 55% and 46%, respectively, of aesthetic systems we delivered were sold under the subscription based model. For the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, approximately 51% and 54% respectively, of our total system revenues were derived from the subscription based model. We have also launched our subscription based model in targeted international markets in which we operate directly. We do not currently offer the ARTAS iX System under the subscription based model. Our subscription model includes an up front fee and a monthly payment schedule, typically over a period of 36 months, with approximately 40% to 45% of total contract payments collected in the first year. For accounting purposes, these arrangements are considered to be sales type finance leases, where the present value of all cash flows to be received under the subscription agreement is recognized as revenue upon shipment to the customer and achievement of the required revenue recognition criteria. Market Overview Aesthetic Procedures The market for aesthetic procedures is large, growing, global in scale, and comprised of both surgical and non surgical procedures. The International Society of Aesthetic Plastic Surgery ( ISAPS ) reported approximately 24.5 million cosmetic procedures worldwide in 2020. Total cosmetic procedures worldwide in 2020 was comprised of approximately 10 million surgical cosmetic procedures and approximately 14.5 million non surgical cosmetic procedures. Total non surgical procedures worldwide in 2020 included approximately 10.5 million injectable procedures primarily neurotoxin and hyaluronic acid fillers with the remaining 4.0 million non surgical, non injectable procedures worldwide in 2020 representing annual addressable procedure opportunity for our minimally invasive and non invasive medical aesthetic technologies. Based on data from Medical Insights reports published in 2021, we estimate the global energy based aesthetic device market totaled approximately $17 billion in 2020. We also estimate this market will increase at 113% compound annual growth rate, or CAGR, to more than $28 billion by the end of 2025. This is in addition to the body shaping and skin tightening market which totaled $10 billion and is projected to grow to $20 billion by 2025, at a of 15.3%. Hair Restoration Procedures According to the 2020 Practice Census Results Report from the International Society of Hair Restoration ( ISHRS ), an estimated 735,312 patients worldwide had a surgical hair restoration procedure in 2019, compared to an estimated 635,189 patients in 2016. The ISHRS estimated the global market for surgical hair restoration treatments totaled $4.6 billion in 2019, compared to $4.1 billion in 2016, representing approximately a 10% increase over the period. We believe several factors are contributing to the growth in the aesthetic and hair restoration markets, including Continuing focus on body image and appearance . Both women and men continue to be concerned with their body image and appearance. Additionally, the population and wealth of the aging baby boomer demographic and its desire to retain a youthful appearance have driven the growth in aesthetic and hair restoration procedures. Wide acceptance of aesthetic procedures. According to the American Society for Aesthetic Plastic Surgery ( ASAPS ), in 2020, people in the U.S. spent more than $9.3 billion on combined surgical and non surgical aesthetic procedures. The number of non surgical procedures has increased, growing 174% from 2000 to 2020, and the number of surgical procedures growing 22% over the same period. 5 Table of Contents Broader availability of minimally and non invasive procedures. Technological developments have resulted in the introduction of a broader range of safe, effective, easy to use, and low cost minimally invasive and non invasive aesthetic procedures, with fewer side effects. This has resulted in wider adoption of aesthetic procedures by practiti1rs. According to the ASAPS, nonsurgical procedures were performed more often in 2019 than surgical procedures. There has also been a market shift to less invasive hair restoration procedures such as FUE which, according to ISHRS, have increased from less than 10% of hair restoration procedures performed in 2004 to about 66% in 2019. Increased physician focus and changing practiti1r economics. Managed care and government payor reimbursement restrictions in the United States, and similar payment related constraints outside of the United States, are motivating practiti1rs to establish or expand their elective aesthetic practices with procedures that are paid for directly by patients. As a result, in addition to traditional aesthetic providers, non traditional providers have begun to perform these procedures. Increasingly affordable treatment solutions. New, lower cost technologies combined with procedure pricing pressures will broaden the patient population for minimally invasive and non invasive aesthetic procedures, which we believe will continue to contribute to increased market demand. Aesthetic Solutions Traditional Aesthetic Treatment Options and Their Limitations We believe that several limitations have restricted the growth of traditional aesthetic technologies and that patients who do not require significant skin tightening, cellulite reduction, circumferential reduction or body contouring will explore non invasive alternatives to minimize the pain, expense, downtime, and surgical risks associated with current invasive procedures. Most existing non invasive procedures are based on various forms of directed energy treatments, such as Radiofrequency ( RF ), Intense Pulsed Light ( IPL ), lasers using various wavelengths, shockwave therapy or ultrasound. Most traditional aesthetic technologies present several limitations, including surgical risks, potentially painful and medication dependent surgical recovery, pain and discomfort, potentially undesired results. In addition, traditional aesthetic technologies are limited in efficacy by the relative skill and technique of the operator, and patient access to invasive treatments is often limited by cost. 6 Table of Contents Our Aesthetic Technology Solutions We have designed a suite of medical aesthetic systems that use our proprietary multipolar pulsed technology ("(MP) 2" ) technology to address the limitations of existing medical aesthetic technologies and procedures. Our systems have the following characteristics Non invasive. Our systems use technologies that are primarily non invasive. Our core (MP) 2 technology combines multipolar RF and magnetic pulse synthesizers to homogenously raise temperature over the entire treatment area and multiple skin layers. Controlled, targeted, uniform heat distribution and the ability to maintain clinically acceptable therapeutic temperature for the entire treatment results in no heat spikes (thermal surges) and eliminates the need for topical cooling agents. Easy to use and delegable technology. We believe that the effective use of our aesthetic systems is not technique dependent and requires limited training and skills to obtain successful aesthetic results. This allows physicians to leverage their own time and increase throughput since procedures can be performed by non physician operators, subject to local regulations. We design our systems to be easy to operate with this benefit in mind. Results for broad range of skin types. Our (MP) 2 technology uses proprietary algorithms that harness the benefits of both RF and Pulsed Electromagnetic Field Therapy ( PEMF ) therapy. This resulting energy matrix penetrates multiple layers of skin, raising temperature homogenously and effectively. We believe this type of skin penetration improves treated conditions and provides visible results for a broad range of skin types. Technology enables products to be designed for affordability. Our technology enables us to focus on designing and manufacturing products at an affordable cost. We offer our products at competitive prices without sacrificing quality, while maintaining our margin objectives. Our competitive prices and subscription model also allow our customers the ability to offer more affordable treatment options to patients. Our Competitive Advantages for the Aesthetic Market Expands potential market. Our subscription based model enables us to sell to both traditional and non traditional customers without the involvement of third party lenders, which allows us to reach many customers who choose not to purchase competitors aesthetic products because of the barriers associated with equipment financing. Mitigates credit risk . Our 30 day activation code technology helps to mitigate the risk that our customers will default on their payments by disallowing use of the system until we receive the monthly payment. Maintains strong customer relationships. Our subscription based model requires us to maintain awareness of customer views and expectations, which allows us to provide high quality services and maintain an on going relationship with customers on an ongoing basis. Our high touch customer philosophy leads to continuous interactions with our customers and enables us to cultivate strong and long term relationships. Controls secondary market resales . Our 30 day activation code technology also reduces the risk that our products will be resold in the secondary market without authorization. This allows us to control the various distribution channels for our products and maximize the value of our products after purchase. Opportunities for access to the newest available Venus Concept s technology and revenue enhancement. Our customers have the opportunity throughout the subscription period to upgrade into our newest available or alternative technology. Our subscription model also allows customers to participate in the most current marketing and branding activities we offer. Our quarterly educational webinars, online promotions events, and periodic remote consultations lead to continuing client interaction and the ability to expand the client business and service offerings. 7 Table of Contents Competitive Advantages for Our Customers in the Aesthetic Market Return on investment. By spreading payments over a 36 month period, our subscription based model is designed to help our customers achieve positive cash flow from their investment in our systems, thus reducing a portion of implementation risk and concerns associated with large initial capital outlays. Expansion of services. Our aesthetic systems allow customers to expand the services offered within their practices. A majority of our systems can be used to treat more than 1 clinical indication, and some products can be purchased as a modular platform that can be modified to match the needs of a growing aesthetic business. To the extent we are successful in receiving FDA and other clearances for additional clinical indications, the value of our modular platform technologies to customer practices may be further enhanced. Leverage physician time and clinic infrastructure. Subject to the local laws of each state in the United States and in other jurisdictions, our physician customers may delegate these non invasive procedures to nurse practiti1rs, technicians, and other non physician trained operators as long as the systems are operated under the physician supervision. We believe that this creates leverage to save physician time and requires the use of less practice infrastructure. Less 1rous credit and disclosure requirements for physicians and clinics. Our subscription based model allows our customers to purchase our products without the involvement of third party lenders or leasing companies that require borrowers to undergo burdensome application, review and fee requirements. Opportunity to upgrade. If the economic conditions are appropriate, our customers in good standing have the opportunity under the subscription based model to upgrade into our newest available or alternative technology, which allows these customers to employ our latest technologies in their practices. Customer Business Development program. Our customer business development program offers marketing and clinical support to our customers. These services focus on improving practice or clinic revenue performance, as well as the customers overall financial and business metrics. In addition, we provide remote educational programs that focus on driving best practices and increasing clinical and economic performance of our customers. Hair Restoration Solutions The treatments for hair loss can broadly be divided between non surgical options and surgical procedures. Non Surgical Options Traditional non surgical options for hair loss include prescription therapeutics and non prescription remedies. In the United States, the FDA has authorized 2 prescription therapeutics for hair loss Rogaine which is applied topically, and Propecia which is ingested in pill form. Both Rogaine and Propecia have several drawbacks, including limited efficacy in some individuals, potential side effects and the need for strict patient compliance for the treatment to have meaningful effect. Surgical Procedures Surgical procedures to address hair loss, specifically follicular unit transplantation ( FUT Strip Surgery ) and FUE, continue to evolve and become more popular. FUE is significantly less invasive than FUT Strip Surgery, which requires the physician to surgically remove a large strip of the patient scalp and implant individual hair follicles from the strip into the patient scalp. This procedure results in a linear scar at the donor area. In a FUE procedure, the physician or technician removes individual hair follicles from the patient scalp without removing a strip of tissue. Because a strip of the patient scalp is not removed, a FUE procedure avoids a long linear scar and reduces the post operative pain and numbness associated with strip surgery. FUE can be performed with manual hand held punches, automated hand held devices (e.g. NeoGraft) or robotically with the ARTAS System. Limitation of Traditional Hair Loss Treatment Options While FUT Strip Surgery and FUE surgery using a hand held device ( Manual FUE ), can provide significant, long term results in restoring hair, there are several limitations associated with these procedures, including the demanding training and major investment of time required for a physician or technician to become proficient, the labor intensive nature of the procedures, the ability of physician or technician to effective create sites for hair follicle implantation, and the risk of inconsistence of physician or technician performance. 8 Table of Contents Our Hair Loss Treatment Solutions The ARTAS Solution We believe the ARTAS System addresses many of the shortcomings of other hair restoration procedures. The ARTAS System is capable of robotically assisting a physician through many of the most challenging steps of the hair restoration process, including the dissection of hair follicles, site planning and recipient site making. We believe, with this assistance, the ARTAS System can help shorten the often long learning curve for both physicians and technicians to become proficient in performing hair restoration procedures. In addition, we believe that by assisting the physician and technicians with many of the repetitive tasks associated with the hair restoration procedures, the ARTAS System can make hair restoration procedures less labor intensive and can reduce operator fatigue, thereby reducing inconsistent results. Further, we believe the ARTAS System site making functionality, which includes an enhanced imaging system and sophisticated algorithms, helps physicians avoid damaging existing follicles and enables them to create a more natural, aesthetically pleasing outcome for the patient. In March 2018, we received 510(k) clearance from the FDA to expand the ARTAS technology to include implantation of harvested hair follicles into our ARTAS iX System for sale in the United States. In December 2018, we completed the International Organization for Standardization (ISO) audit and are compliant with CE Mark requirements which allow for the sale of the ARTAS iX System with implantation functionality in Europe. We strategically market the ARTAS System to hair restoration surgeons, dermatologists, plastic surgeons and aesthetic physicians. We believe we can reach our target physician customers effectively through focused marketing efforts. These efforts include participation in trade shows, scientific meetings, educational symposiums, webinars, online advertising and other activities. For physicians who purchase the ARTAS System, we provide comprehensive clinical training and practice based marketing support. For example, we believe we help our physician customers increase the number of procedures performed by assigning a business development manager ( BDM ) to aid in building the physician customer hair restoration practice. Support from a BDM includes assistance with recruitment, consultation, and conversion of patients. Additionally, BDMs deploy patient marketing materials, assist with social media and digital marketing strategies, and provide other marketing and sales support. Advantages of the ARTAS Procedure Patient Value . We believe the ARTAS System significantly improves the patient experience and outcome in hair transplantation procedures in the following ways The ARTAS procedure provides patients with a minimally invasive, less painful alternative to FUT Strip Surgery. The ARTAS System has a faster recovery time and avoids the long linear scar at the back of the patient head. Through the ARTAS System, the dissection of grafts is performed in a manner that leaves only small pinpoint scars that heal faster and are less detectable than the larger post operative linear scar that would be produced from FUT Strip Surgery. As a result, an ARTAS procedure can, in many cases, offer a shorter recovery time and can enable patients to resume their daily lifestyle faster than with strip surgery. In addition, the ARTAS procedure allows patients to wear their hair shorter without a noticeable scar. The ARTAS site making functionality translates the physician patient site design onto the patient recipient area. The ARTAS System enhanced imaging system and sophisticated algorithms enable the ARTAS System to rapidly create recipient sites at precise depths, replicate pre existing hair angles, avoid damaging the healthy pre existing hair and adjust the distribution of the recipient sites to optimally fill in the transplantation area. We believe these elements can contribute to a superior aesthetic outcome. Physician Value. We believe the ARTAS System provides physicians with compelling economic benefits and enables physicians to achieve consistent reproducible results. As a result, we believe the ARTAS procedure also offers an attractive addition to existing dermatology, plastic surgery or aesthetics practices whether they do or do not currently provide hair restoration procedures in the following ways We believe the ARTAS System and ARTAS 3D pre operative planning software application provide compelling benefits for physicians. The ARTAS System image guided robotic capabilities allow physicians to perform procedures with fewer staff than what might be required for a traditional FUT Strip Surgery or a Manual FUE procedure. With the robotic assistance provided by the ARTAS System, we believe physicians and technicians will be able to perform the complicated, repetitive and often tedious task of dissecting hair grafts with less fatigue and greater productivity than would be possible in a Manual FUE procedure. 9 Table of Contents Hair restoration procedures are generally paid for by the patient and do not involve the complexity of securing reimbursement from third party payors. As we provide high quality training for physicians and their clinical teams on the use of the ARTAS System and because the robotic system and its intelligent algorithms assist these teams in performing hair restoration procedures, we believe we can significantly shorten the learning curve necessary for hair transplantation procedures using the ARTAS System. This shortened learning curve can reduce barriers to entry for a new hair restoration practice. It can also ease the adoption of a new technology into existing practices. Clinically Established Results. Four peer reviewed clinical publications have demonstrated the quality and consistency of grafts produced by the ARTAS System. 1 published study indicated average damage rates for the hair follicles, or transection rates, with the ARTAS System were as low as 6.6%, with a second study documenting average transection rates as low as 4.9% in a separate population of patients. The third study documented that the ARTAS System can be programmed by the physician to select follicular units with larger groupings of hairs while skipping single hair grafts, which allows physicians to choose particular follicular units depending on the hair density they are trying to achieve, providing a clinical benefit as measured by the increase in hairs per harvest of 17% and as measured by the increase in hairs per graft of 114%. Results were statistically significant with a p value less than 0.01 This study also demonstrates the ability of robotic follicular unit graft selection to increase the number of hairs a physician can extract for each incision made in the donor area. The fourth study demonstrated that FUE cases larger than 2,500 grafts, or mega sessions, are possible using the ARTAS System. These peer reviewed publications demonstrate the reproducibility and consistency of dissection results from the ARTAS System in a diverse group of patients, even as the system is used by different clinicians. To our knowledge, there are no other peer reviewed clinical publications that demonstrate the reproducibility of results utilizing other products in FUE or strip surgery procedures. We continue to encourage scientific research in the study of hair restoration to improve our technology, solutions, enhance understanding of our industry and educate physicians on the capabilities of the ARTAS System. The NeoGraft Solution We believe that NeoGraft offers a technology solution that complements our robotic hair restoration system and provides an alternative to FUT Strip Surgery and Manual FUE procedures for our customers and their patients. Patient Value Unlike traditional FUT Strip Surgery procedures, the NeoGraft system is minimally invasive. In a FUE procedure using NeoGraft, rather than surgically removing a portion of the patient scalp, each hair graft is individually dissected from the scalp for transplantation. Because a strip of the patient scalp is not removed, a FUE procedure avoids a long linear scar and reduces the post operative pain and healing process, reducing the risk of potential infection and pain. In addition to treating male pattern hair loss for patients with black and brown straight hair, the NeoGraft may also be used for women and people with curly or light colored hair. NeoGraft can be used for fine tuning of small, specific areas of the scalp, temples and temporal peaks. Physician Value The highly ergonomic mechanical NeoGraft system works as a natural extension of the surgeon's hand, allowing for faster and more accurate harvesting of hair follicles. NeoGraft patients may reach their goal with less time in the procedure room or fewer FUE procedures. Our NeoGraft system is a lower priced option to our ARTAS System making it a feasible alternative for physicians who do not perform a large volume of hair restoration surgeries. 10 Table of Contents Our Strategy Our goal is to become a leading global provider of minimally invasive and non invasive medical aesthetic and hair restoration technologies and their complimentary products. To achieve this goal, we intend to Broaden our portfolio of product offering . We continue to invest in and leverage the extensive energy based technology developed by our experienced research and development team in Israel, and we believe that collaboration with the experienced robotic research and development team in the United States will bring new and innovative technology solutions to the hair restoration and non invasive and minimally invasive categories of aesthetic medicine. Apply robotic technologies to new applications. Our research and development teams in Israel and the United States continue to collaborate on the development of new and innovative technology solutions to the non invasive and minimally invasive categories of aesthetic medicine. We are working on robotically assisted minimally invasive solutions for aesthetic procedures that are primarily treated by surgical intervention. We have commenced a good laboratory practice pre clinical trial with our Aime device, the results of which will be submitted to the FDA for clearance of fractional skin (tissue) excision and resurfacing. In addition, we commenced enrollment for our multicentered clinical trial for treatment of wrinkles on the cheeks in March 2022 We also believe that robotics, machine vision and artificial intelligence can provide significant improvements in the delivery of neurotoxins and volumizers. We are currently investigating the application of our robotic technology to the safe and precise delivery of injectable treatments. Hair restoration market. We continue to focus on providing a complete set of products and services to the hair restoration market. With ARTAS and NeoGraft, we believe that our hair restoration product offering serves a broad segment of the market. Expand FDA (and other regulatory agencies) cleared indications for our products. We intend to seek additional regulatory clearances from the FDA, the National Medical Products Administration (NMPA, previously CFDA), Health Canada and other national regulatory bodies and to extend the scope of our existing FDA clearance and CE Mark certifications. Additionally, we intend to expand the scope of marketable indications for our technologies in other markets. Leverage our subscription based model to new market channels. Our subscription based model offers our customers an alternative to using third party lenders and reduces their initial capital expenditure. We believe that with ever increasing restrictions on government reimbursement for medical procedures, there is a large, predominantly untapped market of physicians and physician owned clinics that are seeking new pay out of pocket revenue streams. Limited availability of cost effective capital financing to many non traditional customers makes it more difficult for these types of providers to build new revenue streams. Our technology and subscription based model are designed to specifically target, support and address these issues, enabling us to expand into previously untapped markets. Expand into non traditional markets. We intend to continue to market our systems to providers of aesthetic services in the large and under penetrated non traditional aesthetic market. We believe the ease of use of our technologies makes our systems suitable for adoption by physicians and other providers in non traditional markets, including general and family practiti1rs and aesthetic medical spas. Enhance our international operations. We have built a direct sales force through wholly owned subsidiaries in the United States, Canada, United Kingdom, Japan, South Korea, Mexico, Argentina, Colombia, Spain, France, Germany, Israel, Australia and China, with a majority owned subsidiary in Hong Kong and a strong and growing ne2rk of international distributors and strategic partners. We have implemented a strategy to bolster our sales and marketing capabilities internationally and believe we are well positi1d to continue to grow our revenue from customers located outside North America. Increase consumer awareness and demand for our products. We intend to continue to employ targeted marketing strategies to engage consumers through social and digital media marketing programs in order to generate awareness of and demand for our technologies, with an emphasis on targeting the non traditional physician market. In furtherance of this strategy, we will continue to leverage current global brand ambassadorships and related media assets to drive promotional activity related to our key products. 11 Table of Contents Our Aesthetic Technologies We use a variety of technologies that allow us to expand into non traditional physician markets. 1 differentiating technology is our proprietary (MP) 2 technology, which synergizes PEMF and a multipolar RF matrix. Our (MP) 2 technology is applicable to a wide range of non invasive skin tightening, wrinkle reduction, body contouring, cellulite, and fat reduction, which have been cleared in the United States, Canada, and Europe, and we have commenced our entrance into the rapidly growing feminine wellness market both domestically and internationally. We also currently have solutions based on other technologies such as fractional ablative RF, IPL and laser technologies, affording a broader set of solution options to address key markets for hair removal, and vascular pigmented lesions, circumference reduction and fat reduction (lipolysis). As part of our strategy, our Venus Velocity, Venus Viva, Venus Viva MD, Venus Fiore, Venus Bliss, Venus Bliss Max, Venus Epileve, ARTAS and NeoGraft systems come with integrated internet of things capabilities. Our (MP) 2 Proprietary Technology Our proprietary (MP) 2 technology employs both PEMF and multipolar RF energy in a synergistic manner. (MP) 2 is noninvasive and because (MP) 2 disperses heat equally across the treatment area, it does not produce potentially painful localized heat spikes, and unlike other devices employing RF, (MP) 2 does not require local cooling during treatment. PEMFs energy is created by running short pulses of electrical current through metal coils, which results in the formation of electromagnetic fields. Electromagnetic fields, in turn, influence the behavior of charged particles, including various biomolecules, within the range of the electromagnetic field to cause 1 or more desired effects at the cellular level. The non thermal impact of PEMF therapy is used for aesthetic application requiring enhanced collagen synthesis, for treatment of wounds, and in the management of postsurgical pain and edema. 12 Table of Contents RF energy, on the other hand, delivers radiofrequency energy that manifests itself as heat within various layers of the skin. The heat generated in the tissue by application of RF energy directly affects fibroblasts, extra cellular matrix and fat cells, thereby triggering natural wound healing processes of the skin and resulting in synthesis of new collagen and elastin fibers. In addition, under predetermined conditions, the heat causes contraction of collagen fibers and lipolysis. In our (MP) 2 technology, we employ a multipolar matrix of RF circuits to produce heat, which is distributed evenly across the treatment area and volume in a proprietary pattern, which results in the quick and uniform heating of the skin layers without overheating any particular area of the skin. Elements of (MP) 2 Technology Benefits of (MP) 2 Technology Our proprietary (MP) 2 technology enables medical and aesthetic practiti1rs to offer a wide range of non invasive skin tightening and body contouring solutions with a technology that is cleared for various indications by the FDA, Health Canada and the European Union (CE Mark). Additional benefits of using our (MP) 2 technology include Delivery of RF energy in a uniform manner. The volumetric homogeneous distribution of heat reduces localized temperature spikes and eliminates the requirement to use a cooling aid, resulting in comfortable treatments. Ergonomic handpieces designed to increase comfort and reduce operator fatigue. The (MP) 2 technology offers a user friendly interface designed to facilitate intuitive operation, and in most cases does not require an extensive training process. Our Additional Key Technologies In addition to our core (MP) 2 technology, we have technologies that use fractional RF (delivery of ablation and coagulation to pre determined fractions of the skin), IPL and laser technologies that allow us to address key markets for skin resurfacing, wrinkle reduction, body contouring, noninvasive lipolysis and circumference reduction, hair removal, acne treatment and treatment of vascular and pigmented lesions. In offering these solutions in the markets where we have marketing clearances or approvals, our goal is to provide improved technologies that are safe and effective for their intended uses and economically viable for our customers. Fractional Ablative RF Fractional ablative coagulative techniques improve the appearance of skin surfaces by micro injuring the skin in a fractional manner to trigger a healing response in the treated area. This both tightens the skin and elicits collagen formation, thus rejuvenating the skin surface. Because our fractional RF technology does not use lasers or other light technologies, which are skin color dependent, fractional RF can be used on patients of all skin t1s. Fractional RF technology has been incorporated into our Venus Viva applicator, supported by our Venus Viva, Venus Viva MD and Venus Versa systems. 13 Table of Contents Intense Pulsed Light Our IPL devices employ non laser high intensity light sources as part of a high output flash lamp to produce a broad wavelength of non coherent light, usually in the 400 to 1200 nm range, that may be further filtered to narrower bands per specific absorption coefficients of predetermined chromophore targets and may be applied to remove unwanted hair as well as vascular and pigmented lesions. We have incorporated IPL technology into our Venus Versa system to expand that treatment offering and to build a modular, upgradable platform that affords a comprehensive solution for common aesthetic treatments. Specifically, the IPL capability permits users of the Venus Versa systems to offer their patients the service options of removing unwanted hair, treating acne vulgaris, and treating vascular and pigmented dermal lesions. Diode Lasers Diode laser technology is a recognized technology for hair removal and lipolysis. The Venus Velocity and Venus Epileve systems achieve hair removal, permanent hair reduction and treatment of ingrown hair using the diode laser. Both devices employ the laser energy to the treatment area through a chilled sapphire light guide that conductively cools the skin surface simultaneously with the delivery of laser energy that is absorbed in the hair follicle pigment, thereby maintaining a lower temperature in the epidermis to enhance the comfort of the procedure and avoid potential epidermal damage while destroying the hair for hair removal. The Venus Velocity and the Venus Epileve systems allow us to expand our offering in the hair reduction market, which is 1 of the most popular non invasive energy based aesthetic procedures in the United States. Our laser technology is also incorporated into our Venus Bliss and Venus Bliss Max devices. The diode laser system is intended for non invasive lipolysis of the abdomen and flanks in individuals with a Body Mass Index of 30 or less. The 1064 nm laser emission performs hyperthermic treatment of the subcutaneous tissue layers and generates an injury to adipocytes (fat cells) through direct heating. The disrupted fat cells and other cellular debris are then removed through the body naturally. Our Robotic Technology We believe our robotic technology has improved multiple phases of the hair transplantation procedure, which include harvesting, recipient site making and implantation. Harvesting During the harvesting phase of an ARTAS hair restoration procedure, the robotic arm and integrated vision system work in tandem to identify the optimal hair follicles to be used in the procedure. The ARTAS vision system uses proprietary algorithms to identify individual hair follicles, growth angle, density, thickness, length and follicle grouping and to determine which grafts to dissect and the optimal order in which they should be dissected. The algorithms recalculate 60 times per second, accommodating patient movement, to provide the physician with accurate up to date information during the course of the procedure. We believe these assessments directly correlate to the quality of the outcome, the state of the donor area and the potential viability for subsequent harvesting for future transplantation procedures. Once optimal hair follicles for transplant are identified by the ARTAS vison system, these follicles are dissected using a sharp needle to score the epidermis and a punch, coaxial with the needle, to separate the graft from the surrounding tissue. In the final step of the harvesting phase, the grafts are removed by the physician or the technician, cleaned, inspected, and prepared for implantation. During the procedure, the physician can customize the dissection incisions by choosing a needle and punch that will produce 0.8mm, 0.9mm or 10mm incisions. The needle travels at speeds that produce targeted precision and a cleanly scored incision. In a clinical setting, the ARTAS System has been shown to move from graft to graft at a rate of approximately 1 to 3 seconds, thereby enabling the ARTAS System to dissect a graft every 2 to five seconds, or approximately 720 to over 1,800 grafts per hour. 14 Table of Contents Recipient Site Making Prior to the ARTAS System, creating sites to receive harvested grafts was performed manually using a hand held tool or needle to create hundreds or thousands of tiny incisions in the scalp. This is a critical step as it creates the hair pattern in which the harvested grafts will grow. The ARTAS System site making functionality incorporates artificial intelligence and robotics precision to strategically make surgical incision sites for implanting hair follicles, while identifying and avoiding injuring healthy follicles in proximity of the implantation sites. This allows the patient hair to look more natural and prevents damaging existing healthy hair in the transplant area which we believe results in patients with more hair than if the sites were created manually. Robotic recipient site making is performed by the physician, who develops the ARTAS System treatment plan, or map, identifying where to make the incisions on the patient scalp. The treatment plan is prepared using 3 dimension modeling software that takes a picture of the patient recipient area and generates a 3 dimensional map that is utilized by the ARTAS System. With entry angle accuracy, consistency and precise depth control, the ARTAS System creates the recipient sites using a small solid core needle or a blade at a rate of approximately 2,500 to 3,000 sites per hour, which is significantly faster than the approximately 1,500 sites per hour achieved manually. Implantation Customers utilizing an ARTAS iX System can utilize the robotic functionality of the system to assist in implanting the dissected follicles. We believe this robotic implantation functionality will help further shorten the learning curve, improve the consistency and reproducibility of results by protecting permanent hair, reduce inconsistencies associated with manual implantation, potentially reduce the amount of time each graft spends outside of the scalp and decrease the overall time required for implantation Our Products Our product portfolio includes nine energy based systems that provide solutions for various non invasive aesthetic applications using Venus Concept (MP) technology, as well as the VariPulse, and or fractional ablative RF, IPL, or laser technologies. We offer 2 hair restoration solutions, NeoGraft and ARTAS, and a series of topical serums to be used with our Venus Glow system. Product name Technology Regulatory Clearance Venus Legacy Venus Legacy combines (MP) 2 with Venus Concept VariPulse technology, which is a software controlled vacuum application, delivering alternating negative and positive pressure to the tissue in 3 predefined programs, to achieve lymphatic drainage, and ease applicator movement as vacuum is applied, and real time thermal feedback to act as a workstation, providing homogeneous heating to multiple tissue depths while allowing for adjustable pulsed suction. United States The Venus Legacy BX is a noninvasive device intended for use in dermatological and general surgical procedures for females for the noninvasive treatment of moderate to severe facial wrinkles and rhytides in Fitzpatrick Skin Types I IV. The Venus Legacy CX using the LB2 and LF2 applicators is intended for the treatment of the following medical conditions for delivery of non thermal RF combined with massage and magnetic field pulses relief of minor muscle aches and pain; relief of muscle spasm; temporary improvement of local blood circulation; and temporary reduction in the appearance of cellulite. Canada Temporary increase of skin tightening, temporary circumferential reduction, temporary cellulite reduction, temporary and wrinkle reduction. European Union (CE Mark) Increase of skin tightening, temporary circumferential reduction, cellulite reduction and wrinkle reduction. 15 Table of Contents Product Name Technology Regulatory Clearance Venus Versa Venus Versa is a versatile system based on a multi application approach. It is a modular and upgradable platform that offers the most in demand aesthetic treatments by supporting 10 optional applicators which utilize Venus Concept (MP) 2 , and IPL and NanoFractional RF technologies. Designed as an open platform, the Venus Versa can be configured to best suit a practice needs with the ability to add additional applications as the practice grows or changes. Depending on the applicator, or the applicator sequence of use, the platform can provide multiple aesthetic solutions. United States, European Union and Canada The Venus Versa system is a multi application device intended for use in aesthetic and cosmetic procedures. The SR515 and SR580 IPL applicators are indicated for treatment of benign pigmented epidermal and cutaneous lesions including, hyperpigmentation, melasma, ephelides (freckles), lentigines, nevi, cafe au lait macules, benign cutaneous vascular lesions including port wine stains, hemangiomas, facial, truncal and leg telangiectasias, rosacea, angiomas and spider angiomas, poikiloderma of civatte, leg veins and venous malformations. The HR650, HR690, HR650XL and HR690XL IPL applicators are indicated for the removal of unwanted hair and to effect stable long term or permanent hair reduction for Skin Types I IV. Permanent hair reduction is defined as the long term stable reduction in the number of hairs re growing when measured at 6, 9, and 12 months after the completion of a treatment regimen. The ACDUAL applicator is intended to be used for the treatment of acne vulgaris. The Viva applicator is intended for dermatological procedures requiring ablation and resurfacing of the skin. The Diamondpolar and Octipolar applicators (United States only) are noninvasive devices intended for use in dermatologic and general surgery procedures for females for the noninvasive treatment of moderate to severe facial wrinkles and rhytides in Fitzpatrick skin types I IV. The Octipolar applicator (European Union and Canada only), is designed for use in temporary body contouring via skin tightening, circumferential reduction, and cellulite reduction. 16 Table of Contents Product Name Technology Regulatory Clearance Venus Viva and Venus Viva MD Venus Viva is an advanced, portable, fractional RF system for dermatological procedures requiring ablation and resurfacing of the skin. Venus Viva uses (Nano)Fractional RF and Smart Scan technologies. The combination of technologies allows ablation coagulation heated z1 density control and pattern generation via a proprietary tip. The energy is delivered through 160 (Viva) or 80 (Viva MD) pins per tip into the treated skin and maintains the surrounding tissue intact and healthy to support the healing process. United States, European Union and Canada The Venus Viva SR is intended for dermatological procedures requiring ablation and resurfacing of the skin. European Union and Canada Using the Diamondpolar applicator for treatment of moderate to severe wrinkles and rhytides in Fitzpatrick skin types I IV. 17 Table of Contents Product Name Technology Regulatory Clearance Venus Velocity The Venus Velocity system uses pulsed laser energy of 800 mm that is absorbed by a chromophore or pigmented target (e.g., melanin in hair follicles) that has high optical absorption at the selected laser wavelength than the surrounding tissue. Different chromophores are targeted for different clinical indications. The selective absorption of different wavelengths leads to localized heating and thermal denaturation and destruction of the anatomic hair follicle target with minimal effect on surrounding tissues. The chilled sapphire light guide conductively cools the skin simultaneously with the delivery of laser energy, thereby maintaining low temperature in the epidermis to enhance the comfort of the procedure and avoid potential epidermal damage. United States, European Union and Canada The Venus Velocity is intended for all Fitzpatrick skin types, including tanned skin, for use in dermatology, general and plastic surgery applications for Hair removal; Permanent hair reduction (defined as the long term stable reduction in the number of hairs regrowing when measured at 6, 9, and 12 months after the completion of a treatment regimen); and Treatment of pseudofolliculitis barbae. 18 Table of Contents Product Name Technology Regulatory Clearance Venus Fiore Venus Fiore incorporates Venus Concept (MP)2 technology, supporting 3 different applicators. Venus Fiore has a desktop configuration and is portable and compact. It incorporates ATC technology, allowing the operator to choose a target temperature within the therapeutic range and have the system adjust the output power accordingly, to automatically maintain the desired temperature. The applicator incorporates 3 pairs of electrodes, each pair of electrodes accompanied by a temperature sensor, allowing the operator to control the temperature in the distal, middle and proximal thirds of the applicator independently. Venus Fiore has received clearance in United States, Canada, the European Union and Israel. United States The Venus Fiore device (K211461) is intended for the treatment of the following medical conditions; using the Pearl, Diamond and Slim applicators for delivery of non thermal RF combined with massage and magnetic field pulses Relief of minor muscle aches and pain, relief of muscle spasm. Temporary improvement of local blood circulation. Temporary reduction in the appearance of cellulite. European Union and Canada The Venus Fiore system is intended for the following With the VG applicator For improvement of symptoms of vaginal laxity and vaginal atrophy. With the MP applicator For dermatological procedures requiring increasing of skin tightening improvement in skin laxity of the Mons Pubis (MP) area. With the LA applicator For dermatological procedures for skin tightening improvement in skin laxity of the Labia Majora (LA) area. Israel Aesthetic and functional treatment of the vagina, labia and mons pubis. 19 Table of Contents Product Name Technology Regulatory Clearance Venus Bliss The Venus Bliss device consists of a console (main unit), 1 RF applicator and four diode laser applicators. The system, via its different applicator types, delivers laser and or bipolar RF energies, vacuum pressure, and pulsed magnetic fields to the skin and the underlying tissues of the treatment area. Venus Bliss delivers laser energy to the subcutaneous tissue layers via the four diode laser applicators connected to the console. The console utilizes diode laser modules as sources of optical energy and the optical output is fiber coupled through the applicator to the treatment area so to increase the temperature of the fat resulting in fat breakdown (lipolysis). In addition, the Venus Bliss device through the (MP)2 applicator provides RF treatments combined with emitted magnetic fields and vacuum massaging. The RF heating effect, together with the non thermal magnetic fields and vacuum, leads to the temporary reduction in the appearance of cellulite, temporary relief of muscle pain and spasm, and improvement of local blood circulation in the subdermal layers. United States and Canada Using the diode laser system, the Venus Bliss device is intended for non invasive lipolysis of the abdomen and flanks in individuals with a Body Mass Index (BMI) of 30 or less. Using the (MP) applicator (United States only) for delivery of RF energy combined with massage and magnetic field pulses, the Venus Bliss device is intended for the treatment of the following medical conditions Relief of minor muscle aches and pain, relief of muscle spasm Temporary improvement of local blood circulation Temporary reduction in the appearance of cellulite. Using the (MP2) applicator (European Union and Canada only) is intended for Temporary increase of skin tightening. Temporary circumferential reduction. Temporary cellulite reduction. Temporary wrinkle reduction. (Canada only) Venus Bliss Max The Venus Bliss Max device is a computerized system comprised of a system console (main unit), four (4) Diode Laser applicators, 1 (1) MP2 (RF+ PEMF+ Vacuum) applicator and four (4) FlexMAX (EMS) applicators. The system delivers laser, bipolar RF and biphasic electrical energies, vacuum pressure, and pulsed electromagnetic fields (PEMF) to the skin and the underlying tissues of the treatment area. The device provides individual adjustment of laser power, EMS intensity level, and RF power, in addition to vacuum levels, for each patient. The console of the Venus Bliss Max device contains a power supply unit, Laser, RF, and EMS controllers, (power modules, on main board), a suction module (vacuum), a controller unit (on main board), Laser water cooling system (power module, on main board), a touch screen user interface and display panel. The applicators are connected to the console via a cable. The RF applicator is comprised of various combinations of RF electrodes, magnetic coils, and vacuum conduits. The Laser applicators are comprised of a light guide, touch sensors and light emitting diodes. The EMS applicator is comprised of 2 electrodes and a light indicator. United States The Venus Bliss Max device is a diode laser system intended for non invasive lipolysis of the abdomen and flanks in individuals with a Body Mass Index (BMI) of 30 or less. In addition, the Venus Bliss Max device is intended for the treatment of the following medical conditions; using the MP 2 applicator for delivery of RF energy combined with massage and magnetic field pulses Relief of minor muscle aches and pain, relief of muscle spasm Temporary improvement of local blood circulation Temporary reduction in the appearance of cellulite. In addition, the Venus Bliss Max device using the FlexMAX applicators is intended for muscle conditioning to stimulate healthy muscles. The Venus Bliss Max device using the FlexMAX applicators is not intended to be used in conjunction with therapy or treatment of medical diseases or medical conditions of any kind. The Venus Bliss Max device using the FlexMAX applicators is intended to be operated by a trained professional 20 Table of Contents Product Name Technology Regulatory Clearance Venus Glow Venus Glow consists of a console and applicator. It is used to improve skin appearance using powerful tri modality treatment combining a rotating tip, a vacuum modality and a jet. Venus Glow deep cleans pores by removing impurities such as daily dirt and debris, dry or dead skin cells, and excess sebum. United States (listed as a Class I device by the FDA) Motorized dermabrasion device. Canada (listed as a Class I device). European Union Not a medical device. NeoGraft Venus Concept NeoGraft device is an advanced hair restoration technology with an automated FUE and implantation system. The procedure leaves no linear scar and is minimally invasive. United States (listed as a Class I device by the FDA) Surgical instrument motors and accessories that are intended for use during surgical procedures to provide power to operate various accessories or attachments to cut hard tissue or b1 and soft tissue. Canada (listed as Class I without indication) European Union Hair Transplant device Venus Epileve The Venus Epileve system uses pulsed laser energy of 800 mm that is absorbed by a chromophore or pigmented target (e.g., melanin in hair follicles) while skin surface is being chilled, for different indications of hair removal and permanent hair reduction. Venus Epileve is intended to provide an entry level, affordable solution for non traditional markets for hair removal of all skin types. European Union and Canada The Venus Epileve is intended for all Fitzpatrick skin types, including tanned skin, for use in dermatology, general and plastic surgery applications for hair removal, permanent hair reduction (defined as the long term stable reduction in the number of hairs re growing when measured at 6, 9, and 12 months after the completion of a treatment regimen); and treatment of pseudofolliculitis barbae. 21 Table of Contents Product Name Technology Regulatory Clearance ARTAS iX The ARTAS System is comprised of the cart, which includes the robotic arm, integrated vision system, artificial intelligence algorithms and a series of proprietary end effectors employed in an automatic manner. The accessories at the distal end of the robotic arm, such as the automated needle and punch, that interact with the patient scalp and hair follicles and perform various clinical functions including hair follicle harvesting and implantation. United States and Canada Harvesting hair follicles from the scalp in men diagnosed with androgenic alopecia who have black or brown straight hair. The ARTAS System is intended to assist physicians in identifying and extracting hair follicles units from the scalp during hair transplantation, creating recipient sites and implanting the harvested hair follicles. European Union Computer assisted hair follicle harvesting, incision making and implantation system. 22 Table of Contents Products in Development Our ongoing research and development activities are primarily focused on improving and enhancing our current technologies, products, and services, as well as expanding our current product offering with the introduction of new products for different aesthetic, medical and hair restoration applications. We are currently developing the following products and technologies Skin Resurfacing and Wrinkle Treatment on the Aime Platform The skin resurfacing and wrinkle treatment technology contained in our upcoming Aime platform is intended to provide a non surgical alternative to lift and tighten skin for procedures typically requiring surgical intervention. It uses mechanical vision, artificial intelligence and robotics to achieve the intended outcomes. The punches utilized for coring are designed not to leave scars on tissue. The skin will be contracted and smoothed after coring by applying a flexible patch to the area which will allow healing of the skin with predefined directional effect. Venus Astera We are working on the next generation of the well established Venus Legacy product line. This device is intended to extend the capabilities of the original Venus Legacy system product line by combining (MP) and VariPulse technologies with real time thermal feedback and ATC to provide homogeneous heating to multiple tissue depths while allowing for adjustable pulsed suction to further support deep energy penetration. This will result in enhanced lymphatic drainage and improved circulation stimulation. The device will come with both hand held and hands free applicators which will include both EMS and (MP) technologies. In addition, our research and development efforts also currently include research to expand indications, broaden our offering of system applicators, advance our proprietary (MP)2 technology, add new technologies and indications, continue to support our harvesting and site making functions, as well as the implantation functionality for the ARTAS iX System, develop design improvements and new products, and implement a technology platform to record and collect information on each treatment procedure. VeroGrafter Services In the United States, we offered the services of a group of independently contracted technicians who are certified to assist physicians during a hair restoration procedure. These technicians, who we marketed as VeroGrafters , must successfully complete a yearly certification process to remain active. VeroGrafters service was offered for NeoGraft and ARTAS procedures until it was discontinued in the fourth quarter of 2021 23 Table of Contents Clinical Developments We continue to invest in research and development to support our technology, marketing and post marketing surveillance. We also have a portfolio of 20 peer reviewed publications and more than 20 white papers, many of which pertain to indications cleared outside of the United States to educate users in other countries and to study expanded indications in the United States. Authors for several of these publications hold stock options in Venus Concept or were paid consultants for us. Research has shown that (MP) 2 technology improves aspects of textural lesions and body contouring. The fractional RF has been shown to improve skin structure, including wrinkles and scars through ablation and resurfacing. IPL technology used in the Venus Versa has shown to be versatile and effective for treating vascular and pigmented lesions, acne and rosacea. Our diode laser technology has been shown to be effective for lipolysis and reduction of fat layer thickness, as well as efficiently effecting hair reduction removal. Additionally, the Venus Fiore device has demonstrated ability to improve symptoms related to vaginal atrophy. We have a number of ongoing clinical trials covering both new technologies and the development of expanded indications for existing technology. Clinical trials are conducted frequently to develop new technologies and support existing technologies and their respective enhancements and upgrades. Sales and Marketing We market and sell our products and services to the traditional medical aesthetic market including plastic surgeons and dermatologists, as well as to a broad base of non traditional physician markets, including general and family practiti1rs and aesthetic medical spas. Direct Sales We currently provide our subscription model and traditional sales model, as well as the associated marketing support programs through our wholly owned subsidiaries in the United States, Canada, United Kingdom, Japan, South Korea, Mexico, Argentina, Colombia, Spain, France, Germany, Israel, Australia, and China as well as through Venus Concept majority owned subsidiary in Hong Kong. Direct sales force. In the United States and select international markets, we use our direct sales force to sell our systems and other products and services. As of December 31, 2021, we had a direct sales and marketing team of approximat ely 166 employees, managed by 1 President of Global Sales, four Vice Presidents of Sales for various international markets and 1 Vice President of Global Marketing. We plan to continue to expand our direct sales organization in the United States and other international markets of focus to help facilitate further adoption among a broad market. Distributors. In countries where we do not operate directly, we sell our products through distributors. As of December 31, 2021, we had distribution agreements in over 60 c ountries. We enter into both exclusive and non exclusive distribution agreements, which generally provide the distributor with a right to distribute certain of our products within a designated territory. Each agreement sets forth the minimum quarterly purchase commitments and if the distributor fails to meet its minimum purchase commitments, we have the ability to either convert any exclusive distribution rights to non exclusive rights during the then remaining term or terminate the agreement. To provide more comprehensive customer support, these agreements require our distributors to provide after sales service to customers, such as training and technical support, and various marketing activities, such as preparing and executing marketing plans and working with key market leaders in the designated territory to promote the product. 24 Table of Contents Marketing and Branding Programs We are focused on, and invest heavily in, direct to consumer marketing initiatives to increase awareness of our products and services. We believe our marketing activities are both cost effective and critical in supporting the continued growth and development of our business. As of December 31, 2021, we had a Vice President of Global Marketing, with regional Marketing Managers in Europe, Middle East and Africa, and Latin America. We have an internal team of digital media, brand, marketing operations and events specialists that support North America and our regional Marketing Managers. We implemented business to business and business to customer public relations outreach strategies that incorporates both digital media and top national media channels in the fashion and beauty industries and have a presence on the most popular social media channels, such as Facebook, Twitter, YouTube, Pinterest, LinkedIn and Instagram. We also attend major medical and scientific meetings, as well as trade shows. Since some countries require customized marketing programs, we have hired country specific marketing managers to ensure that marketing programs are executed successfully in those jurisdictions. Customer Support We provide our customers and authorized distributors with customer support through our fully integrated marketing program and strong clinical and technical support teams. Customer Business Development Program To support the growth initiatives of our customers, we have built a business development strategy that provides customers with a fully integrated marketing support program with business and marketing tools to grow their practices, improve their financial and business performance, and maximize their return on investment while also providing sales strategies related to our products and ancillary services. Our customer business development program includes the following features Inclusion in an advanced clinic directory that is promoted online to consumers. The full page listing includes the clinic contact information, business hours, website, social media profiles and a full list of available Venus Concept device treatments. A comprehensive device launch plan, guidance on effective pricing and bundling strategies and involved in short and long term business goal reviews and tracking. Online courses and private remote workshops related to business strategies and clinic efficiency including customer retention and conversion strategies, effective patient consultation, credentialing, Venus Concept devices sales talking points, teleph1 skills, cross selling and up selling techniques, and photography best practices. Our workshops related to marketing strategies include search engine optimization essentials and cover social media and marketing strategies. New Customer Launch's Kits comprised of a starter package with marketing materials necessary to introduce and promote new Venus Concept products with a heavy emphasis on a digital and social media strategy. Analysis of business practices with instruction on effective patient consultation and conversion strategies. Analysis of current social media and online marketing efforts and guidance on how to attract and convert potential consumers more efficiently. For hair restoration customers, access to specialized VeroHair 12 Step Program designed to assist ARTAS and NeoGraft customers with building a successful hair restoration practice. Technical and Clinical Support We provide a warranty for the majority of our products against defects in materials and workmanship under normal use and service for a period of 1 year, with certain other products carrying a different warranty correlating to the number of uses the product undergoes or based upon the perishability of the product. Once the warranty expires, our customers have the option of purchasing an extended warranty service contract, which is typically for a term of 1 to 3 years. 25 Table of Contents We maintain a technical and clinical support team to field inquiries, troubleshoot product issues, facilitate sales activities and support the commercial activities of our direct offices and its international distributors. We provide immediate response technical support to our physician customers and distributors year round. In the event that an issue arises, our technical support personnel will work with our customers to determine if a technical issue may be resolved over the teleph1 or requires a service visit. In markets where we do not have our own service engineers, the service and support of our products is managed by our independent distributors. In order to maximize customer up time, we proactively deploy replacement systems, modules, and comp1nts to strategic hubs worldwide. Manufacturing and Quality Assurance We have our own research and development centers in Yokneam, Israel, and San Jose, California and use 3 ISO certified contract manufacturers in Karmiel, Israel, Mazet, France and Weston, Florida. We assemble the ARTAS System in San Jose, California, while reusable and disposable kits are assembled exclusively for us by NPI Solutions, Inc. ( NPI ) based in Morgan Hill, California. We work closely with our manufacturers and perform final quality control testing using our own employees stati1d in the manufacturing facilities around the world. Having over 85% of the production of our systems in close proximity to our research and development and operations facilities enables us to control the entire process from product development through manufacturing and final testing, allowing us to provide advanced, high quality systems as well as the flexibility to create customized solutions for our customers. Also, using multiple manufacturers allows us a greater degree of flexibility in adjusting production levels to meet fast changing market demand. We do not have any long term supply agreements for comp1nts. Manufacturing facilities that produce medical devices intended for distribution in the United States and internationally are subject to regulation and periodic unannounced inspection by the FDA and other domestic and international regulatory agencies. In the United States, we are required to manufacture our products in compliance with the FDA Quality System Regulations ( QSR ), which covers the methods and documentation of the design, testing, control, manufacturing, labeling, quality assurance, packaging, storage, and shipping of our products. In international markets, we are required to obtain and maintain various quality assurance and quality management certifications. We conform with and are in full compliance with ISO134852016, CE (MDD MDR) and MDSAP. We maintain a quality system designed to be compliant with quality system management and QSR and have procedures in place to ensure that all products and materials we purchase conform to our specifications, including evaluation of suppliers, and where required, qualification of the comp1nts supplied. We believe that our current facilities are adequate to support our operations. 26 Table of Contents Intellectual Property Portfolio We rely on a combination of patent, copyright, trademark and trade secret laws, and confidentiality and invention assignment agreements to protect our intellectual property rights. As of December 31, 2021, our patent portfolio is comprise d of 12 issued U.S. patents which cover ou r (MP) 2 , fractional RF and Directional Skin Tightening technology that are associated with six different patent families (the earliest of which will expire in 2028), 8 pending U.S. patent applications, 23 issued foreign counterpart patents, and 9 pending foreign counterpart patent applications; 7 issued foreign patents covering the NeoGraft system and its methods of use (the earliest of which expire in 2022); and 97 issued U.S. patents primarily covering the ARTAS System and methods of use (the earliest of which expire in 2025, 3 pending U.S. patent applications, 148 issued foreign counterpart patents, and 14 pending foreign counterpart patent applications. As of December 31, 2021, our trademark portfolio included the following trademark registrations, pending trademark applications or common law trademark rights, among others Venus Concept, Venus Fiore, Venus Freedom, Venus Glow, Venus Legacy Venus Viva and Venus Viva MD, Venus Versa, Venus Bliss, Venus Bliss Max, ARTAS, ARTAS iX, AIME , Venus Concept delivering the promise (logo), NeoGraft and (MP) 2 . We continue to file new trademark applications in many countries to protect our current and future products and related slogans. License Agreement with HSC Development LLC and James A. Harris, MD In July 2006, we entered into a license agreement (the HSC License Agreement ) with HSC Development LLC, or HSC, and James A. Harris, M.D., as amended, pursuant to which we received an exclusive, worldwide license to develop, manufacture and commercialize products covered by any of the licensed patent rights or that incorporate the licensed technology in the field of performance of hair removal and implantation, including transplantation, procedures using a computer controlled system in which a needle or other device carried on a mechanized arm is oriented to a follicular unit for extraction of same, or to an implant site for implantation of a follicular unit, or some combination thereof. Under the HSC License Agreement, we developed the ARTAS System to be utilized as a robotic system to assist a physician in performing hair restoration procedures. In consideration for the license, we issued to HSC 25,000 shares of our common stock, prior to the Company 1 for 10 reverse stock split, and paid HSC a 1 time payment of $25,000. The license grant is perpetual, and the license agreement does not provide a right for HSC or Dr. Harris to terminate the HSC License Agreement. The licensed patents cover, in general, a method and device for the extraction of follicular units from a donor area on a patient. The method includes scoring the outer skin layers with a sharp punch, and then inserting a blunt punch into the incision to separate the hair follicle from the surrounding tissue and fatty layer. The method and device significantly decrease the amount of follicular transection and increase the rate at which follicular units can be extracted. There are other embodiments not herein disclosed. The licensed patents will expire from 2025 through 2030. Competition The medical technology and aesthetic product markets are highly competitive and dynamic and are characterized by rapid and substantial technological development and product innovation. Demand for our systems is impacted by the products and procedures offered by our competitors. Certain of our systems also compete against conventional non energy based treatments, such as neurotoxins and dermal fillers, chemical peels, and microdermabrasion. In the United States, we compete against companies that have developed minimally invasive and non invasive medical aesthetic procedures. Outside of the United States, likely due to less stringent regulatory requirements, there are more aesthetic products and procedures available in international markets than are cleared for use in the United States. Sometimes, there are also fewer limitations on the claims our competitors in international markets can make about the effectiveness of their products and the manner in which they can market them. As a result, we may face a greater number of competitors in markets outside of the United States. We also compete generally with medical technology and aesthetic companies, including those offering products and services unrelated to skin treatment. Recently, there has been consolidation in the aesthetic industry leading to companies combining their resources, which increases competition and could result in increased downward pressure on our system prices. 27 Table of Contents In the surgical hair restoration market, we consider our direct competition to be FUT Strip Surgeries and Manual FUE procedures. Many of our surgical device and equipment competitors have greater capital resources, sales and marketing operations and service infrastructures than we do, as well as longer commercial histories and more extensive relationships with physicians. FUT Strip Surgery and some Manual FUE procedures have a greater penetration into the hair restoration market, due in part to having a longer history in the market. Our indirect competition in the hair restoration market also includes non surgical treatments for hair loss, such as prescription therapeutics, including Propecia, and non prescription remedies, such as wigs, hair pieces and spray on applications. We believe that our competitors systems compete largely based on the following factors company and product brand recognition; effective marketing and education; sales force experience and access; product support and service; technological innovation, product enhancements and speed of innovation; pricing and revenue strategies; product reliability, safety and durability; ease of use; consistency, predictability and durability of aesthetic results; and procedure costs to patients. Government Regulation The design, development, manufacture, testing and sale of our products are subject to regulation by numerous governmental authorities, including the FDA, and corresponding state and foreign regulatory agencies. Regulation by the FDA In the United States, the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act ( FDCA ), the FDA regulations and other federal and state statutes and regulations govern, among other things, medical device design and development, preclinical and clinical testing, premarket clearance or approval, registration and listing, manufacturing, labeling, storage, advertising and promotion, sales and distribution, export and import, and post market surveillance. The FDA enforces the FDCA, and the regulations promulgated pursuant to the FDCA. Each medical device that we wish to distribute commercially in the United States requires marketing authorization from the FDA prior to distribution unless an exemption applies. The 2 primary types of FDA marketing authorizations applicable to a device are premarket notification, also called 510(k) clearance, and premarket approval ( PMA ). The type of marketing authorization is generally linked to the classification of the device. The FDA classifies medical devices into 1 of 3 classes (Class I, II, or III) based on the degree of risk the FDA determines to be associated with a device and the level of regulatory control deemed necessary to ensure the device safety and effectiveness for its intended use(s). Devices requiring fewer controls because they are deemed to pose lower risk are placed in Class I or II. Class III devices are those for which insufficient information exists to assure safety and effectiveness solely through general or special controls and include life sustaining, life supporting or implantable devices, devices of substantial importance in preventing impairment of human health, or which present a potential, unreasonable risk of illness or injury. Most Class I devices and some Class II devices are exempted by regulation from the 510(k) clearance requirement and can be marketed without prior authorization from the FDA. By contrast, devices placed in Class III generally require PMA approval or approval of a de novo reclassification petition prior to commercial marketing. The FDA 510(k) clearance process usually takes from 3 to nine months but can take longer. For products requiring PMA approval, the regulatory process generally takes from 1 to 3 years or more, from the time the application is filed with the FDA and involves substantially greater risks and commitment of resources than either the 510(k) clearance or de novo processes. 28 Table of Contents 510(k) Clearance To obtain 510(k) clearance for a medical device, an applicant must submit a premarket notification to the FDA demonstrating that the device is substantially equivalent to a previously cleared 510(k) device or a device that was in commercial distribution before May 28, 1976 for which the FDA has not yet called for PMA approval, commonly known as the predicate device. A device is substantially equivalent if, with respect to the predicate device, it has the same intended use and has either (i) the same technological characteristics or (ii) different technological characteristics and the information submitted demonstrates that the device is as safe and effective as a legally marketed device and does not raise different questions of safety or effectiveness. After a device receives 510(k) marketing clearance, any modification that could significantly affect its safety or effectiveness, or that would constitute a major change or modification in its intended use, will require a new 510(k) marketing clearance or, depending on the modification, a de novo classification or PMA approval. We have made modifications to our products in the past and have determined based on our review of the applicable FDA regulations and guidance that in certain instances new 510(k) clearances or PMA approvals were not required. PMA Approval A PMA application must be submitted if the device cannot be cleared through the 510(k) process and is found ineligible for de novo reclassification. PMA applications must be supported by valid scientific evidence, which typically requires extensive data, including technical, preclinical, clinical, and manufacturing data, to demonstrate to the FDA satisfaction the safety and effectiveness of the device. A PMA application must also include, among other things a complete description of the device and its comp1nts; a detailed description of the methods, facilities and controls used to manufacture the device; and proposed labeling. Approval of FDA review of an initial PMA application may require several years to complete. Clinical Trials Clinical trials are almost always required to support the FDA approval of a premarket approval application and are sometimes required for 510(k) clearances. If a device presents a significant risk, as defined by the FDA, to human health, the device sponsor may need to file an investigational device exemption ( IDE ) application with the FDA and obtain an IDE approval prior to commencing the human clinical trials. The IDE application must be supported by appropriate data, such as animal and laboratory testing results, showing that it is safe to test the device in humans and that the testing protocol is scientifically sound. The IDE application must be approved in advance by the FDA for a specified number of patients, unless the product is deemed a non significant risk device and eligible for more abbreviated IDE requirements. Clinical trials for a significant risk device may begin once the IDE application is approved by the FDA and the appropriate institutional review boards ( IRB ). Clinical trials are subject to extensive monitoring, recordkeeping and reporting requirements. Similarly, in Europe a clinical study must be approved by the local ethics committee and in some cases, including studies of high risk devices, by the ministry of health in the applicable country. In the EU, physico chemical tests carried out on the medical device may be necessary in order to obtain the CE mark. These tests must be performed by accredited laboratories for Class II b and III medical devices. The reports and tests are required to be filed in a technical file submitted to the notified body for validation of and obtaining the CE mark. Regulation 2017 745 (MDR) applicable as of May 2021 in the EU will significantly strengthen the requirements for clinical evaluation (EC). The clinical evaluation for Class II b and Class III medical devices will be based on a critical evaluation of relevant scientific publications, the results of all available clinical investigations as well as the consideration of other medical devices with the same purpose. Regulation 2017 745 notably requires the manufacturer to carry out a post marketing safety monitoring plan, which includes post marketing clinical follow ups (SCAC) in order to update information about the devices marketed throughout its life cycle, and notably any adverse effects. Post market Regulation Any devices that are manufactured or distributed pursuant to clearance or approval by the FDA are subject to pervasive and continuing regulation by the FDA and certain state agencies. After a device is placed on the market, numerous regulatory requirements continue to apply. These include establishment registration and device listing with the FDA, QSR requirements, labeling and marketing regulations, clearance or approval of product modifications, medical device reporting regulations, correction, removal and recall reporting regulations, Unique Device Identifiers (UDI) compliance, the FDA recall authority, and post market surveillance activities and regulations. 29 Table of Contents We may be subject to similar foreign laws that may include applicable post marketing requirements such as safety surveillance. Our manufacturing processes are required to comply with the applicable portions of the QSR, which cover the methods and the facilities and controls for the design, manufacture, testing, production, processes, controls, quality assurance, labeling, packaging, distribution, installation and servicing of finished devices intended for human use. The QSR also requires, among other things, maintenance of a device master file, device history file, and complaint files. As a manufacturer, we are subject to periodic scheduled or unscheduled inspections by the FDA. A failure to maintain compliance with the QSR requirements could result in the shut down of, or restrictions on, our manufacturing operations and the recall or seizure of products. The FDA has broad regulatory compliance and enforcement powers. If the FDA determines that we failed to comply with applicable regulatory requirements, it can take a variety of compliance or enforcement actions. For additional information on these potential actions and other governmental regulation risks, see , Item 1A Risk Factors Risks Related to Government Regulation included elsewhere in this report. Fraud and Abuse Regulations Federal and state governmental agencies subject the healthcare industry to intense regulatory scrutiny, including heightened civil and criminal enforcement efforts. These laws constrain the sales, marketing and other promotional activities of medical device manufacturers by limiting the kinds of financial arrangements they may have with physicians and other potential purchasers of their products. Violations may result in substantial civil penalties, including treble damages, and criminal penalties, including imprisonment, fines and exclusion from participation in federal health care programs. The Federal False Claims Act also contains whistleblower or qui tam provisions that allow private individuals to bring actions on behalf of the government alleging that the defendant has defrauded the government. Venus Concept products, and treatment using our products, are not reimbursable by Medicare, Medicaid or other federal health care programs, or by commercial insurance. As a result, many federal and state fraud and abuse statutes do not apply to Venus Concept. Compliance with applicable United States and foreign laws and regulations, such as import and export requirements, anti corruption laws such as the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and similar worldwide anti bribery laws, tax laws, foreign exchange controls and cash repatriation restrictions, data privacy and data security requirements, environmental laws, labor laws and anti competition regulations, increases the costs of doing business in foreign jurisdictions. In some cases, compliance with the laws and regulations of 1 country could violate the laws and regulations of another country. Many foreign countries have similar laws relating to healthcare fraud and abuse. Foreign laws and regulations may vary greatly from country to country. Violations of these laws, or allegations of such violations, could result in fines, penalties, or prosecution and have a negative impact on our business, results of operations and reputation. There has been a recent trend of increased foreign, federal, and state regulation of payments and transfers of value provided to healthcare professionals, such as physicians, and entities. However, certain foreign countries and the U.S. states also mandate implementation of commercial compliance programs, impose restrictions on device manufacturer marketing practices and require tracking and reporting of gifts, compensation and other remuneration to healthcare professionals and entities. Violations of these laws, or allegations of such violations, could result in fines, penalties, or prosecution and have a negative impact on our business, results of operations and reputation. Foreign Government Regulation The regulatory review process for medical devices varies from country to country, and many countries also impose product standards, packaging requirements, environmental requirements, labeling requirements and import restrictions on devices. Each country has its own tariff regulations, duties, and tax requirements. Failure to comply with applicable foreign regulatory requirements may subject a company to fines, suspension or withdrawal of regulatory approvals, product recalls, seizure of products, operating restrictions, criminal prosecution, or other consequences. 30 Table of Contents European Economic Area In the European Economic Area ( EEA ), our devices are required to comply with the Essential Requirements set forth in Annex I to the Council Directive 93 42 EEC concerning medical devices, commonly referred to as the Medical Devices Directive. Compliance with the Medical Devices Directive entitles a manufacturer to affix the CE mark to its medical devices, without which they cannot be commercialized in the EEA. To demonstrate compliance with the Essential Requirements and to obtain the right to affix the CE mark to medical devices, they must undergo a conformity assessment procedure, which varies according to the type of medical device and its classification. Except for low risk medical devices (Class I with no measuring function and which are not sterile), where the manufacturer can issue an EC Declaration of Conformity based on a self assessment of the conformity of its products with the Essential Requirements, a conformity assessment procedure requires the intervention of a notified body, which is an organization designated by the competent authorities of an EEA country to conduct conformity assessments. The notified body typically audits and examines products Technical File and the quality system for the manufacture, design and final inspection of our devices before issuing a CE Certificate of Conformity demonstrating compliance with the relevant Essential Requirements. Following the issuance of this a CE Certificate of Conformity, Venus Concept can draw up an EC Declaration of Conformity and affix the CE mark to the products covered by this CE Certificate of Conformity and the EC Declaration of Conformity. We have successfully completed several notified body audits since our original certification in December 2009. Following these audits, our notified body issued ISO 134852016 Certificate and CE Certificates of Conformity allowing it to draw up an EC Declaration of Conformity and affix the CE mark to certain of our devices since 2019 MDSAP Certificate. After the product has been CE marked and placed on the market in the EEA, a manufacturer must comply with a number of regulatory requirements relating to registration of medical devices in individual EEA countries; pricing and reimbursement of medical devices; establishment of post marketing surveillance and adverse event reporting procedures; field safety corrective actions, including product recalls and withdrawals; and interactions with physicians. In 2017, the European Parliament passed the Medical Devices Regulation, which repeals and replaces the EU Medical Devices Directive. Unlike directives, which must be implemented into the national laws of the EEA member States, the regulations would be directly applicable, i.e., without the need for adoption of the EEA member State laws implementing them, in all the EEA member States and are intended to eliminate current differences in the regulation of medical devices among EEA member States. The Medical Devices Regulation, among other things, is intended to establish a uniform, transparent, predictable and sustainable regulatory framework across the EEA for medical devices and in vitro diagnostic devices and ensure a high level of safety and health while supporting innovation. The Medical Devices Regulation is now effective. The new regulations will, among other things strengthen the rules on placing devices on the market and reinforce surveillance once they are available; establish explicit provisions on manufacturers responsibilities for the follow up of the quality, performance and safety of devices placed on the market; improve the traceability of medical devices throughout the supply chain to the end user or patient through a unique identification number; set up a central database to provide patients, healthcare professionals and the public with comprehensive information on products available in the EU; and strengthen rules for the assessment of certain high risk devices, such as implants, which may have to undergo an additional check by experts before they are placed on the market. 31 Table of Contents To the extent that our products have already been certified under the existing regulatory framework, the MDR allows us to market them provided that the requirements of the transitional provisions are fulfilled. In particular, the certificate in question must still be valid. Under article 120(2) MDR, certificates issued by notified bodies before May 25, 2017 will remain valid until their indicated expiry dates. By contrast, certificates issued after May 25, 2017 will be void at the latest by May 27, 2024. Accordingly, before that date, we will need to obtain new CE Certificates of Conformity. Furthermore, the regulation introduces UDI, i.e. a bar code that must be placed on the label of the device or on its packaging, and manufacturers will be obligated to file adverse effects reports via the Eudamed platform in case there is an increase in the frequency or severity of incidents related to the medical device. Environmental Regulation We are subject to numerous foreign, federal, state, and local environmental, health and safety laws and regulations relating to, among other matters, safe working conditions, product stewardship and environmental protection, including those governing the generation, storage, handling, use, transportation and disposal of hazardous or potentially hazardous materials. Some of these laws and regulations require us to obtain licenses or permits to conduct our operations. Environmental laws and regulations are complex, change frequently and have tended to become more stringent over time. Although the costs to comply with applicable laws and regulations have not been material, we cannot predict the impact on our business of new or amended laws or regulations or any changes in the way existing and future laws and regulations are interpreted or enforced, nor can we ensure we will be able to obtain or maintain any required licenses or permits. Data Privacy and Data Security We are subject to diverse laws and regulations relating to data privacy and data security, both in the United States and internationally. New global privacy rules are continually being enacted and existing 1s are being updated and strengthened. Failure to comply with any privacy or data security laws or regulations or any security incident or breach involving the misappropriation, loss or other unauthorized access, use or disclosure of sensitive or confidential patient or consumer information, whether by us, 1 of our business associates or another third party, could have a material adverse effect on our business, reputation, financial condition and results of operations, including but not limited to material fines and penalties; damages; litigation; consent orders; and injunctive relief. For additional information on the risks we face with regard to data privacy and security, please see , Item 1A Risk Factors included elsewhere in this report. Because the laws and regulations continue to expand, differ from jurisdiction to jurisdiction, and are subject to evolving (and at times inconsistent) governmental interpretation, compliance with these laws and regulations may require significant additional cost expenditures or changes in products or business that increase competition or reduce revenue. Noncompliance could result in the imposition of fines, penalties, orders to stop noncompliant activities, or orders to stop doing business in a jurisdiction. We are also subject to evolving international laws on data transfer, data localization and electronic marketing. The rules on data transfer will apply when we transfer personal data to group companies or third parties outside of certain geographies. For example, there is currently litigation challenging companies data transfers using the EEA standard contractual clauses and use of third party cookies. It is uncertain whether such transfers will be invalidated by the European courts. These changes may require us to find alternative bases for the compliant transfer of personal data from the EEA to the United States to change vendors, or to arrange for local storage of personal data and we are monitoring developments in this area. Employees As of December 31, 2021, we had a total of 407 full time employees. Of the total number of employees, 136 were based in the United States, 82 based in Canada, 69 based in Israel, and 120 in the rest of the world. Of the total number of full time employees, approximately 166 are direct sales representatives, including sales management. 32 Table of Contents Corporate Information We were founded on November 22, 2002 as a Delaware corporation. Our principal executive offices are located at 235 Yorkland Blvd., Suite 900, Toronto, Ontario M2J 4Y8 Canada and our teleph1 number is (877) 848 8430. You may find on our website at https www.venusconcept.com en us electronic copies of our annual report on Form 10 K, quarterly reports on Form 10 Q, current reports on Form 8 K, and amendments to those reports filed or furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the 1934 Act. Such filings are placed on our website as soon as reasonably practicable after they are filed with the SEC. Our most recent charter for our audit, compensation, and nominating and corporate governance committees and our Code of Business Conduct and Ethics and our Anti Corruption Policy are available on our website as well. Any waiver of our Code of Business Conduct and Ethics may be made only by our board of directors. Any waiver of our Code of Business Conduct and Ethics for any of our directors or executive officers must be disclosed on a Current Report on Form 8 K within four business days, or such shorter period as may be required under applicable regulation. Information contained on, or that can be accessed through, our website is not incorporated by reference into this Annual Report on Form 10 K, and you should not consider information on our website to be part of this Annual Report on Form 10 K. We have included our website address as an inactive textual reference only. Available Information We file Annual Reports on Form 10 K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10 Q, Current Reports on Form 8 K and other information with the SEC. Our filings with the SEC are available free of charge on the SEC website at www.sec.gov and on our website under the Investor Relations tab as soon as reasonably practicable after we electronically file such material with, or furnish it to, the SEC. 33 Table of Contents Item Item 1A. Risk Factors. Our operations and financial results are subject to various risks and uncertainties, including those described below, any of which could adversely affect our business, results of operations, financial condition and prospects. In such an event, the market price of our common stock could decline, and you may lose all or part of your investment. Additional risks and uncertainties not presently known to us or that we currently deem immaterial may also adversely affect our business operations. You should carefully consider the risks described below and the other information in this Annual Report on Form 10 K, including our audited consolidated financial statements and the related notes thereto, and Management s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations. Risks Related to Our Business Our subscription based model exposes us to the credit risk of our customers over the life of the subscription agreement. In the event that our customers fail to make the monthly payments under their subscription agreements, our financial results may be adversely affected. For the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, approximately 51% and 54%, respectively, of our system revenues were derived from our subscription based model. Although the ARTAS System is not available under our subscription based model, we expect our subscription based business model to continue to represent the majority of our revenue for the foreseeable future. We collect an up front fee, combined with a monthly payment schedule typically over a period of 36 months, with approximately 40% to 45% of total contract payments collected in the first year. For accounting purposes, these arrangements are considered to be sales type finance leases, where the present value of all cash flows to be received under the subscription agreement is recognized as revenue upon shipment of the system to the customer. As part of our sales and marketing effort, we do not generally require our customers to undergo a formal credit check as is typically required with third party equipment lease financing. Instead, to ensure that each monthly installment is made on time and that the customer systems are serviced in accordance with the terms of the warranty, every system requires a monthly activation code, which we provide to the customer upon receiving each monthly installment. If a customer does not make timely payment of a monthly installment, the customer will not receive an activation code and will be unable to use the system. Because this process does not protect us from the economic impact of a customer failure to make its monthly payments, we normally maintain a purchase m1y security interest over the devices sold under a subscription agreement and therefore enjoy priority as a secured creditor, entitling us to certain rights in the event of a customer default or bankruptcy. We cannot provide any assurance that the financial position of customers purchasing products and services under a subscription agreement will not change adversely before we receive all the monthly installment payments due under the contract. As a result of the global economic turmoil that has resulted from COVID 19, many of our customers experienced difficulty in making timely payments, or payments at all, during the pandemic which had resulted in higher than anticipated bad debt expense over the course of the 2020 and 2021 fiscal years. Despite the improvement we have seen in our collection experience, we cannot assure you that our customers will continue payments under their agreements or that we will not experience customer defaults even after local economies reopen for business. In the event that there is a default by any of the customers to whom we have sold systems under the subscription based model, we may recognize bad debt expenses in our general and administrative expenses. If the extent of such defaults is material, it could negatively affect our results of operations and operating cash flows. We offer credit terms to some qualified customers and distributors. In the event that any of these customers default on the amounts payable to us, our financial results may be adversely affected. In addition to our subscription based model, we generally offer credit terms of 30 to 90 days to qualified customers and distributors. In the event that there is a default by any of the customers or distributors to whom we have provided credit terms, we may recognize bad debt expenses in our general and administrative expenses. If the extent of such defaults is material, it could negatively affect our future results of operations and cash flows. Additionally, in the event of deterioration of general business conditions, we may be subject to increased risk of non payment of our accounts receivables. We may also be adversely affected by bankruptcies or other business failures of our customers, distributors, and potential customers. A significant delay in the collection of accounts receivable or a reduction of accounts receivables collected may impact our liquidity or result in bad debt expenses. 34 Table of Contents Our recurring losses from operations and negative cash flows raise substantial doubt about our ability to continue as a going concern. We have had recurring net operating losses and negative cash flows from operations, and until we generate revenue at a level to support our cost structure, we expect to continue to incur substantial operating losses and net cash outflows. As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, we had an accumulated deficit of $180.4 million and $157.4 million, respectively. Our recurring losses from operations and negative cash flows raise substantial doubt about our ability to continue as a going concern, meaning that we may be unable to continue operations for the foreseeable future or realize assets and discharge liabilities in the ordinary course of operations. In order to continue our operations, we must achieve profitable operations and or obtain additional equity or debt financing. There can be no assurance that we will be successful in raising additional capital or that such capital, if available, will be on terms that are acceptable to us. If we are unable to raise sufficient additional capital, we may be compelled to reduce the scope of our operations and planned capital or research and development expenditures or sell certain assets, including intellectual property assets. The perception of our ability to continue as a going concern may make it more difficult for us to obtain financing for the continuation of our operations and could result in the loss of confidence by investors, suppliers and employees. Our consolidated financial statements do not include any adjustments that may result from the outcome of this uncertainty. Business or economic disruptions or global health concerns could have an adverse effect on our business, operating results or financial condition. Global business, economic disruptions and or global health concerns could adversely affect our business result in social, economic, and labor instability in the countries in which we, the third parties with whom we engage, and our customers operate. Any of these events could negatively impact our business, operating results or financial condition. In December 2019, an outbreak of COVID 19 originated in Wuhan, China developed into a global pandemic and has resulted in multiple extended shutdowns of businesses in North and South America, Europe and Asia Pacific and gradual re openings of economies. While we have experienced significant improvements related to revenue, cash flows and sales trends throughout fiscal year 2021, we continue to experience some negative impact our ability to conduct business in the manner planned. Disruptions to our business include restrictions on the ability of our sales and marketing personnel and distributors to travel and sell our systems, disruptions of our global supply chain and manufacturing, reduced demand and or suspension of operations by our customers which has impacted their ability to make monthly subscription payments. We do not yet know the full extent of the impact of COVID 19 on our business, financial condition and results of operations. While we expect continued recovery in most of the markets within which we operate in the first half of the year, the extent to which the COVID 19 pandemic may impact our business, operating results, financial condition, or liquidity in the future will depend on future developments which are evolving and uncertain, including the severity of resurgences of the virus and its variants of concern, travel restrictions, business and workforce disruptions, the timing of and extent of reopening the economic regions in which we do business and the effectiveness of actions taken to contain and treat the disease. 35 Table of Contents Our loan and security agreements contain restrictions that may limit our flexibility to effectively operate our business. CNB Loan Agreement We have a revolving credit facility with City National Bank of Florida ( CNB ) pursuant to a loan agreement (the CNB Loan Agreement ) which, among other things, contains various covenants that limit our ability to engage in specified types of transactions and requires us to maintain either a minimum cash balance in deposit accounts or a maximum total liability to tangible net worth ratio and a minimum debt service coverage ratio. An event of default under the CNB Loan Agreement would cause a default under the Notes and the MSLP Loan Agreement, each as described below, provided that a waiver of each default by CNB will also result in the termination of the corresponding default in the Notes. Upon the occurrence, and during the continuance of, an event of default under the CNB Loan Agreement, if we are unable to repay all outstanding amounts, CNB may foreclose on the collateral granted to it to collateralize the indebtedness, which would significantly affect our ability to operate our business. In addition, the CNB Loan Agreement is secured by substantially all of our assets and the assets of certain of our subsidiaries. For additional details of the CNB Loan Agreement, the related agreements and the covenants to which we are subject, see Management Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations and Note 12 Credit Facility to the consolidated financial statements included elsewhere in this report. Main Street Priority Lending Program Term Loan On December 8, 2020, Venus Concept USA Inc. ("Venus USA"), a wholly owned subsidiary of the Company, executed a loan and security agreement (the MSLP Loan Agreement ), a Promissory Note (the MSLP Note ), and related documents for a loan in the aggregate amount of $50.0 million for which CNB will serve as lender pursuant to the Main Street Priority Loan Facility as established by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System Section 13(3) of the Federal Reserve Act (the MSLP Loan ). Venus USA obligations under the MSLP Loan will be secured pursuant to a Guaranty of Payment and Performance dated as of December 8, 2020 (the Guaranty Agreement ), by and between the Company and CNB. On December 9, 2020, the MSLP Loan was funded and the transaction closed. For additional details of the MSLP Loan Agreement, see Note 10 Main Street Term Loan to our consolidated financial statements included elsewhere in this report. The MSLP Note provides for customary events of default, including, among others, those relating to a failure to make payment, bankruptcy, breaches of representations and covenants, and the occurrence of certain events. In addition, the MSLP Loan Agreement and MSLP Note contain various covenants that limit our ability to engage in specified types of transactions. Subject to limited exceptions, these covenants limit our ability, without CNB consent, to, among other things, sell, lease, transfer, exclusively license or dispose of our assets, incur, create or permit to exist additional indebtedness, or liens, to make dividends and other restricted payments, and to make certain changes to our ownership structure. 36 Table of Contents Madryn Credit Agreement and Exchange Agreement On October 11, 2016, Venus Ltd. entered into a credit agreement as a guarantor with Madryn Health Partners, LP, as administrative agent, and certain of its affiliates as lenders (collectively, Madryn ), as amended (the Madryn Credit Agreement ), pursuant to which Madryn agreed to make certain loans to certain of Venus Concept subsidiaries. Contemporaneously with the MSLP Loan Agreement, the Company, Venus USA, Venus Concept Canada Corp. ( Venus Canada ), Venus Ltd., and the Madryn Noteholders (as defined below), entered into a Securities Exchange Agreement (the Exchange Agreement ) dated as of December 8, 2020, pursuant to which the Company (i) repaid on December 9, 2020, $425 million aggregate principal amount owed under the Madryn Credit Agreement, and (ii) issued, on December 9, 2020, to the Madryn Health Partners (Cayman Master), LP and Madryn Health Partners, LP (the Madryn Noteholders ) secured subordinated convertible notes in the aggregate principal amount of $26.7 million (the Notes ). The Madryn Credit Agreement was terminated effective December 9, 2020 upon the funding and closing of the MSLP Loan and the issuance of the Notes. In connection with the Exchange Agreement, we also entered into a Guaranty and Security Agreement dated as of December 9, 2020 (the Madryn Security Agreement ), pursuant to which we agreed to grant Madryn a security interest in substantially all of our assets to secure the obligations under the Notes. The Madryn Security Agreement contains various covenants that limit our ability to engage in specified types of transactions. Subject to limited exceptions, these covenants limit our ability, without the Madryn Noteholders consent, to, among other things, incur, create or permit to exist additional indebtedness, or liens, and to make certain changes to our ownership structure. The Madryn Security Agreement also contains a covenant which requires that if we or any of our subsidiaries that has guaranteed the Notes consummates a disposition of material assets the result of which is that less than 50% of the consolidated net tangible assets of such entities secure the Notes then, within 90 days thereafter, we and our subsidiaries party to the Madryn Security Agreement must provide certain additional collateral so that more than 50% of the consolidated net tangible assets of the Company and its subsidiaries which have guaranteed the Notes will be collateral securing the Notes. If an Event of Default occurs, then, the Madryn Noteholders may, subject to certain terms, (i) declare the outstanding principal amount of Notes, all accrued and unpaid interest and all other amounts owing under the Notes and other transaction documents entered into in connection therewith to be immediately become due and payable without any further action or notice by any person (ii) foreclose on the collateral granted to it to collateralize the indebtedness and (ii) exercise all rights and remedies available to it under the Notes, the Madryn Security Agreement and any other document entered into in connection with the foregoing, which would significantly affect our ability to operate our business. For additional information regarding the Madryn Credit Agreement, the Exchange Agreement, the Notes and related agreements, see Note 11 Madryn Long Term Debt and Convertible Notes to our consolidated financial statements included elsewhere in this report. If we default on our loans secured under the Coronavirus Aid, Relief and Economic Security (CARES) Act, we may default on our CNB Loan Agreement and or MSLP Loan. We and 1 of our subsidiaries received an aggregate of $4.1 million in funding in connection with the PPP Loans. For additional details of the PPP Loans, see Management Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations included elsewhere in this report. The Company has applied for and received partial forgiveness of Venus USA PPP Loan in the amount of $17 million and the Venus Concept PPP Loan in the amount of $11 million. 37 Table of Contents The PPP Loans contain certain covenants which, among other things, restrict our use of the proceeds of the respective PPP Loan to the payment of payroll costs, interest on mortgage obligations, rent obligations and utility expenses, require compliance with all other loans or other agreements with any creditor of us or Venus USA, to the extent that a default under any loan or other agreement would materially affect our or Venus USA ability to repay its respective PPP Loan and limit our ability to make certain changes to our ownership structure. If we and or Venus USA defaults on our or its respective PPP Loan (i) events of default will occur under the CNB Loan Agreement and MSLP Loan, and (ii) we and or Venus USA may be required to immediately repay their respective PPP Loan. We will require additional financing to achieve our goals, and a failure to obtain this necessary capital when needed on acceptable terms, or at all, could force us to delay, limit, reduce or terminate our product development, commercialization and other operations or efforts. Since our inception, we have invested a significant portion of our efforts and financial resources in research and development and sales and marketing activities. Research and development, clinical trials, product engineering, ongoing product upgrades and other enhancements and seeking regulatory clearances and approvals to market future products will require substantial funds to complete. As of December 31, 2021, we had capital resources consisting of cash and cash equivalents of approximately $30.9 million. Further, in order to grow our business and increase revenues, we will need to introduce and commercialize new products, grow our sales and marketing force, and implement new software systems. We believe that we will continue to expend substantial resources for the foreseeable future in connection with the ongoing commercializing of our systems, increasing our sales and marketing efforts, and continuing research and development and product enhancements activities. We will have to continue to increase our revenues while effectively managing our expenses in order to achieve profitability and to sustain it. Our operating expenses may fluctuate significantly in the future because of a variety of factors, many of which are outside of our control. Our failure to control expenses could make it difficult to achieve profitability or to sustain profitability in the future. Our budgeted expense levels are based in part on our expectations concerning future revenue from systems sales, product sales and servicing and procedure based fees. We may be unable to reduce our expenditures in a timely manner to compensate for any unexpected shortfalls in revenue. Accordingly, a significant shortfall in market acceptance or demand for our systems and procedures could have a material adverse impact on our business and financial condition. While we believe that the net proceeds from our recent financing activities, the proceeds from the PPP Loans and other government assistance programs, together with our existing cash and cash equivalents, will enable us to fund our operating expenses and capital expenditure requirements for at least the next 12 months, we may need to raise additional capital through public or private equity or debt financings or other sources, such as strategic collaborations so1r than expected or otherwise implement additional cost saving initiatives. Any such financing may result in dilution to stockholders, the issuance of securities that may have rights, preferences, or privileges senior to those of holders of our common stock, the imposition of more burdensome debt covenants and repayment obligations, the licensing of rights to our technology or other restrictions that may affect our business. In addition, we may seek additional capital if favorable market conditions exist or given other strategic considerations even if we believe we have sufficient capital to fund our current or future operating plans. Additional funds may not be available when we need them, on terms that are acceptable to us, or at all. If adequate funds are not available to us on a timely basis, we may be required to delay or curtail our efforts to develop system product enhancements or new products, including any clinical trials that may be required to market such enhancements; delay or curtail our plans to increase and expand our sales and marketing efforts; or delay or curtail our plans to enhance our customer support and marketing activities. We are restricted by covenants in the MSLP Loan, the Amended CNB Loan Agreement, the PPP Loans, the Madryn Security Agreement and other government assistance programs. These covenants restrict, among other things, our ability to incur additional indebtedness, which may limit our ability to obtain additional debt financing. 38 Table of Contents Because we incur a substantial portion of our expenses in currencies other than the U.S. dollar, our financial condition and results of operations may be adversely affected by currency fluctuations and inflation. In the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, 58% and 53%, respectively, of our global revenues were denominated in U.S. dollars and our reporting currency was the U.S. dollar. We pay a meaningful portion of our expenses in New Israeli Shekels ( NIS ), Canadian Dollars ( CAD ), and other foreign currencies. Expenses in NIS and CAD accounted for 28% and 17%, respectively, of our expenses for the year ended December 31, 2021, and 17% and 9%, respectively, of our expenses for the year ended December 31, 2020. Salaries paid to our employees, general and administrative expenses and general sales and related expenses are paid in many different currencies. As a result, we are exposed to the currency fluctuation risks relating to the denomination of its future revenues in U.S. dollars. More specifically, if the U.S. dollar devalues against the CAD or the NIS, our CAD and NIS denominated expenses will be greater than anticipated when reported in U.S. dollars. Inflation in Israel compounds the adverse impact of such devaluation by further increasing the amount of our Israeli expenses. Israeli inflation may also in the future outweigh the positive effect of any appreciation of the U.S. dollar relative to the CAD and the NIS, if, and to the extent that, it outpaces such appreciation or precedes such appreciation. We generally do not engage in currency hedging to protect the Company from fluctuations in the exchange rates of the CAD, NIS, and other foreign currencies in relation to the U.S. dollar (and or from inflation of such foreign currencies), and we may be exposed to material adverse effects from such movements. We cannot predict any future trends in the rate of inflation in Israel or the rate of devaluation (if any) of the U.S. dollar or any other currency against the NIS or CAD. Downturns in the economy or economic uncertainty may reduce patient and customer demand for our systems and services, which could adversely affect our business, financial condition or results of operations. Our results of operations could be adversely affected by general conditions in the global economy and in the global financial markets. Furthermore, the aesthetic industry in which we operate is particularly vulnerable to unfavorable economic trends. Treatments using our systems involve elective procedures, the cost of which must be borne by patients, and is not reimbursable through government or private health insurance. Economic uncertainty may reduce patient demand for the procedures performed using our systems; if there is not sufficient patient demand for the procedures for which our systems are used, practiti1r demand for these systems could drop, negatively impacting operating results. The decision to undergo a procedure using our systems is driven by consumer demand. In times of economic uncertainty or recession, individuals generally reduce the amount of m1y that they spend on discretionary Item, including aesthetic procedures. If our customers patients face economic hardships, our business would be negatively impacted, and our financial performance would be materially harmed in the event that any of the above factors discourage patients from seeking the procedures for which our systems are used. A weak or declining economy could also strain our manufacturers or suppliers, possibly resulting in supply disruption, or cause our customers to delay or stop making payments for our systems or services. As a result of the ongoing COVID 19 pandemic and the economic turmoil that has resulted, we expect that some of our customers will continue to experience difficulty in making timely payments or payments at all under their subscription agreements. Any of the foregoing could harm our business and we cannot anticipate all of the ways in which the economic climate and financial market conditions, including the effect of the COVID 19 pandemic, could adversely impact our business. The impact of economic uncertainty on our industry may vary from region to region. It is difficult to forecast our future performance and our financial results may fluctuate unpredictably. The rapid evolution of the markets for medical technologies and aesthetic products makes it difficult for us to predict our future performance. Several factors, many of which are outside of our control, may contribute to fluctuations in our financial results, such as variations in market demand for our systems and services from quarter to quarter; the inability of our customers to obtain the necessary financing or access capital; performance of new functionalities and system updates; performance of third party distributors, manufacturers or suppliers; positive or negative media coverage of our systems, positive or negative patient experiences, the procedures or products of our competitors, or our industry generally; our ability to maintain our current, or obtain further, regulatory clearances, approvals or CE Certificates of Conformity; seasonal or other variations in patient demand for aesthetic procedures; and introduction of new medical aesthetic procedures or products and services that compete with our products and services. 39 Table of Contents Our success depends upon patient satisfaction with our procedures. If there is not sufficient patient demand for our procedures, our financial results and future prospects will be negatively impacted. Our procedures are elective aesthetic procedures, the cost of which must be borne by the patient and is not covered by or reimbursable through government or private health insurance. In order to generate repeat and referral business, patients must be satisfied with the effectiveness of the procedures conducted using our systems. The decision to undergo 1 of our procedures is thus driven by patient demand, which may be influenced by a number of factors, such as the success of our sales and marketing programs, the extent to which our physician customers recommend our procedures to their patients, the extent to which our procedures satisfy patient expectations, the cost, safety, and effectiveness of our systems versus other aesthetic treatments, and general consumer confidence, which may be impacted by economic and political conditions outside of our control. Our financial performance will be negatively impacted in the event we cannot generate significant patient demand for procedures performed with our systems. We compete against companies that offer alternative solutions to our systems, or have greater resources, a larger installed base of customers and broader product offerings than we have. If we are not able to effectively compete with these companies and alternative solutions, our business may not continue to grow. The medical technology and aesthetic product markets are highly competitive and dynamic and are characterized by rapid and substantial technological development and product innovation. Demand for our systems is impacted by the products and procedures offered by our competitors. Certain of our systems also compete against conventional non energy based treatments, such as Botox and collagen injections, chemical peels, and microdermabrasion. In the United States, we compete against companies that have developed minimally invasive and non invasive medical aesthetic procedures. Outside of the United States, likely due to less stringent regulatory requirements, there are more aesthetic products and procedures available in international markets than are cleared for use in the United States. Sometimes, there are also fewer limitations on the claims our competitors in international markets can make about the effectiveness of their products and the manner in which they can market them. As a result, we may face a greater number of competitors in markets outside of the United States. We also compete generally with medical technology and aesthetic companies, including those offering products and products unrelated to skin treatment. Aesthetic industry consolidations have created combined entities with greater financial resources, deeper sales channels, and greater pricing flexibility than ours. Rumored or actual consolidation of our competitors could cause uncertainty and disruption to our business. In the surgical hair restoration market, we consider our direct competition to be FUT Strip Surgeries and Manual FUE procedures. Many of our surgical device and equipment competitors have greater capital resources, sales and marketing operations and service infrastructures than we do, as well as longer commercial histories and more extensive relationships with physicians. Our indirect competition in the hair restoration market also includes non surgical treatments for hair loss, such as prescription therapeutics, including Propecia, and non prescription remedies, such as wigs, hair pieces and spray on applications. Some of these companies have greater resources than we do, a broad range of product offerings, large direct sales forces, and long term customer relationships with the physicians we target, which could make our market penetration efforts more difficult. Competition in the medical technology and aesthetic hair restoration markets could result in price cutting, reduced profit margins, and limited market share, any of which would harm our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Surgical alternatives to the ARTAS System may be able to compete more effectively than the ARTAS procedure in established practices with trained staff and workflows built around performing these surgical alternatives. Practices experienced in offering FUT Strip Surgery or Manual FUE using hand held devices may be reluctant to incorporate or convert their practices to offer ARTAS procedures due to the effort involved to make such changes. These alternative options may be able to provide satisfactory results for male hair loss, generally at a lower cost to the patient than the ARTAS System. As a result, if patients choose these competitive alternatives, our results of operation could be adversely affected. 40 Table of Contents We may not be able to establish or strengthen our brand. We believe that establishing and strengthening our brand is critical to achieving widespread acceptance of our systems, particularly because of the highly competitive nature of the market for aesthetic treatments and procedures. Promoting and positioning our brand will depend largely on the success of our marketing efforts and our ability to provide physicians with reliable systems and services. Given the established nature of our competitors, it is likely that our future marketing efforts will require us to incur significant expenses. These brand promotion activities may not yield increased sales and, even if they do, any sales increases may not offset the expenses we incur to promote our brand. If we fail to successfully promote and maintain our brand, or if we incur substantial expenses in an unsuccessful attempt to promote and maintain our brand, systems may not achieve adequate acceptance by physicians, which would adversely affect our business, results of operations and financial condition. Further, negative posts or comments about us or any of our brands on any social ne2rking website could seriously damage our reputation. The aesthetic equipment market is characterized by rapid innovation. Our inability to develop and or acquire new products and services, obtain regulatory clearance and maintain regulatory compliance, market new products successfully, and identify new markets for our technology may cause us to fail to compete effectively. The aesthetic energy based treatment equipment and hair restoration markets are subject to continuous technological development and product innovation. If we do not continue to innovate and develop new products, services and applications, our competitive position will likely deteriorate as other companies successfully design and commercialize new products, applications and services or enhancements to current products. To continue to grow in the future, we must continue to develop and or acquire new and innovative aesthetic and medical products, services and applications, identify new markets, and successfully launch any newly developed or acquired product offerings. To successfully expand our product and service offerings, we must, among other things, develop or otherwise acquire new products that either add to, or significantly improve, our current product offerings, obtain regulatory clearance for and adhere to regulatory requirements relating to the commercialization of new products, sell our product offerings to a broad customer base, identify new markets and alternative applications for our technology, and protect existing and future products with defensible intellectual property. Historically, product introductions have been a significant comp1nt of our financial performance. To be successful in the medical aesthetics industry, we believe we need to continue to innovate. Our business strategy is based, in part, on our expectation that we will continue to increase or enhance our product offerings. We need to continue to devote substantial research and development resources to introduce new products, which can be costly and time consuming to our organization. We also believe that, to increase revenue from sales of new products, we need to continue to develop our clinical support, further expand and nurture relationships with industry thought leaders, and increase market awareness of the benefits of our new products. However, even with a significant investment in research and development, we may be unable to continue to develop, acquire or effectively launch and market new products and technologies regularly, or at all. If we fail to successfully innovate and commercialize new products or enhancements, our business may be harmed. 41 Table of Contents We may be unsuccessful in penetrating certain international markets through majority owned subsidiary arrangements with local partners. We have established a majority owned subsidiary in Hong Kong as part of our international growth strategy. Although we have selected our local partners based on demonstrated experience and expertise in the local aesthetic market, the nature of our arrangements with local partners requires us to share control with unaffiliated third parties. We may not be able to identify local partners with the requisite experience and expertise in their local markets or successfully negotiate an agreement with such local partners. Moreover, the ability of this subsidiary to execute its business plan depends on the local partners fulfillment of their obligations. If local partners fail to fulfill their obligations to our satisfaction, our financial results could be adversely affected, and we may be required to either increase our level of commitment to the subsidiary and dedicate additional resources or divest our interest in the subsidiary. Although our agreements with our local partners generally allow us control over business operations, differences in views could also result in delayed execution of the subsidiary business plan. If these differences cause the subsidiary to deviate from our business plan, our results of operations could be adversely affected. We may be unsuccessful in expanding and managing our direct sales and marketing forces effectively. We rely on our own direct sales force and in house marketing department to sell our systems and services in North America and in international markets. In order to meet our anticipated sales objectives, we expect to continue to grow our global sales and marketing organization over the next several years. There are significant risks involved in building and managing a sales and marketing organization, including risks related to our ability to hire qualified individuals as needed; generate sufficient leads within our target customer group for our sales force; provide adequate training for the effective sale and marketing of our systems and services; retain and motivate our direct sales and marketing professionals; effectively oversee geographically dispersed sales and marketing teams; and work successfully with local partners of our majority owned subsidiaries. Our failure to adequately address these risks could have a material adverse effect on our ability to increase sales and use of our systems and services, which would cause our revenues to be lower than expected and harm our results of operations. We depend on third party distributors to market and sell our systems in certain markets. In addition to our direct sales and marketing forces, we currently depend on third party distributors to sell, market, and service our systems in certain markets outside of North America and to train our customers in these markets. For the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, we generated 9% and 7%, respectively, of our systems revenues from sales made through third party distributors. Our agreements with third party distributors set forth minimum quarterly purchase commitments required for each distributor and provide the distributor the right to distribute its systems within a designated territory. As we continue to expand into new markets outside of North America, we will need to engage additional third party distributors which exposes us to a number of risks, including the lack of day to day control over the activities of third party distributors; third party distributors may not commit the necessary resources to market, sell, train, support and service our systems to the level of our expectations; third party distributors may emphasize the sale of third party products over our products; third party distributors may not be as selective as we would be in choosing customers to purchase our systems or as effective in training physicians in marketing and patient selection; third party distributors may violate applicable laws and regulations, which may limit our ability to sell products in certain markets; and disagreements with our distributors that could require or result in costly and time consuming litigation or arbitration, which we could be required to conduct in jurisdictions in which we are not familiar with the governing law. 42 Table of Contents Economic and other risks associated with international sales and operations could adversely affect our business. Sales in markets outside of the United States accounted for approximately 49% of our revenue for the year ended December 31, 2021 and 56% of our revenue for the year ended December 31, 2020. In addition, the majority of our research and development activities and the manufacture of our systems are located outside of the United States. As a result of our international business, we are subject to a number of risks, including difficulties in staffing and managing our international operations; increased competition as a result of more products and procedures receiving regulatory approval or otherwise free to market in international markets; longer accounts receivable payment cycles and difficulties in collecting accounts receivable; reduced or varied protection for intellectual property rights in some countries; import and export restrictions, trade regulations, and non U.S. tax laws; fluctuations in currency exchange rates; foreign certification and regulatory clearance or approval requirements; customs clearance and shipping delays; political, social, and economic instability abroad, terrorist attacks, and security concerns in general and uncertainties related to the coronavirus; preference for locally manufactured products; potentially adverse tax consequences, including the complexities of foreign value added tax systems, tax inefficiencies related to our corporate structure, and restrictions on the repatriation of earnings; the burdens of complying with a wide variety of foreign laws and different legal standards; and increased financial accounting and reporting burdens and complexities. If 1 or more of these risks were realized, it could require us to dedicate significant financial and management resources, and our results of operations and financial condition could be adversely affected. 43 Table of Contents The success of our hair restoration business depends upon the success of the ARTAS System . If we are unsuccessful in continuing to develop the market for robotic hair restoration or the market acceptance for the ARTAS System fails to grow significantly, our business and future prospects will be negatively impacted. Our success in the hair restoration market depends on the acceptance among physicians and patients of the ARTAS System as the preferred system for performing hair restoration surgery. Acceptance of the ARTAS System by physicians is significantly dependent on our ability to convince physicians of the benefits of the ARTAS System to their practices and, accordingly, develop the market for robotic assisted hair restoration surgery. Acceptance of the ARTAS procedure by patients is equally important as patient demand will influence physicians to offer the ARTAS procedure, and the degree of market acceptance of the ARTAS System by physicians and patients is unproven. We believe that market acceptance of the ARTAS System will depend on many factors, including the perceived advantages or disadvantages of the ARTAS System relative to other hair restoration products and treatments; th e safety and efficacy of the ARTAS System relative to other hair restoration products and treatments; the price of the ARTAS System relative to other hair restoration products and treatments; our success in expanding and integrating our hair restoration sales and marketing organization; the effectiveness of our marketing, advertising, and commercialization initiatives; our success in adding new functionalities to the ARTAS System and enhancing existing functions; and our ability to obtain regulatory clearance to market the ARTAS System for additional treatment indications in the United States. In addition, we must be able to demonstrate that the cost of our systems and the revenue that a physician can derive from performing procedures are compelling when compared to the costs and revenue associated with alternative treatments the physician can offer and persuade physicians to purchase our systems instead of those of our competitors, many of whom already have existing relationships with our target physicians. We believe our marketing programs, including clinical support, will be critical to increasing utilization and awareness of our systems, particularly the ARTAS Systems, but these programs require physician commitment and involvement to succeed. Further, the ARTAS iX System, which was launched in July 2018, includes our robotic implantation functionality. As this functionality is relatively new, it is possible that it could include defaults, bugs or present other technical issues which could prompt potential physician customers to delay their purchase of the ARTAS iX System or could prompt physicians that have purchased the ARTAS iX System not to utilize the system. We cannot assure you that the ARTAS System will achieve broad market acceptance among physicians and patients. As we expect to derive a significant portion of our revenue in the hair restoration market from ARTAS System sales, servicing and procedure based fees, any failure of this product to satisfy physician or patient demand or to achieve meaningful market acceptance will harm our business and future prospects. 44 Table of Contents We rely on a limited number of third party contract manufacturers for the production of our systems and only have contracts with certain suppliers for the comp1nts used in our systems. The failure of these third parties to perform could adversely affect our ability to meet demand for our systems in a timely and cost effective manner. We rely on third party contract manufacturers in Karmiel, Israel, Mazet, France, Weston, Florida and San Jose, California for the manufacture of the majority of our systems. Other than with respect to the ARTAS iX System and diode stacks for certain of our devices, the majority of the comp1nts used in our systems are available off the shelf and we do not rely on any single supplier, and as a result we do not have any long term supply agreements for these comp1nts. Our reliance on third party contract manufacturers and suppliers involves a number of risks, including, among other things contract manufacturers or suppliers may fail to comply with regulatory requirements or make errors in manufacturing that could negatively affect the efficacy or safety of our systems or cause delays in shipments of our systems; we or our contract manufacturers or suppliers may not be able to respond to unanticipated changes in customer orders, and if orders do not match forecasts, we or our contract manufactures may have excess or inadequate inventory of materials and comp1nts; we or our contract manufacturers and suppliers may be subject to price fluctuations due to a lack of long term supply arrangements for key comp1nts; we or our contract manufacturers and suppliers may lose access to critical services and comp1nts, resulting in an interruption in the manufacture, assembly and shipment of our systems; we may experience delays in delivery by our contract manufacturers and suppliers due to changes in demand from us or their other customers; fluctuations in demand for systems that our contract manufacturers and suppliers manufacture for others may affect their ability or willingness to deliver comp1nts to us in a timely manner; our suppliers or those of our contract manufacturers may wish to discontinue supplying comp1nts or services to us for risk management reasons; we may not be able to find new or alternative comp1nts or reconfigure our system and manufacturing processes in a timely manner if the necessary comp1nts become unavailable; and our contract manufacturers and suppliers may encounter financial hardships unrelated to our demand, which could inhibit their ability to fulfill its orders and meet our requirements. If any of these risks materialize, they could significantly increase our costs and effect our ability to meet demand for our systems. If we are unable to satisfy commercial demand for our systems in a timely manner, our ability to generate revenue would be impaired, market acceptance of our systems and our reputation could be adversely affected, and customers may instead purchase or use our competitors products. In addition, we could be forced to secure new or alternative contract manufacturers or suppliers. Securing a replacement contract manufacturer or supplier could be difficult. The introduction of new or alternative manufacturers or suppliers also may require design changes to our medical device products that are subject to the FDA and other regulatory clearances or approvals, or a new or revised CE Certificate of Conformity. We may also be required to assess the new manufacturer compliance with all applicable regulations and guidelines, which could further impede our ability to manufacture our systems in a timely manner. As a result, we could incur increased production costs, experience delays in deliveries of our systems, suffer damage to our reputation, and experience an adverse effect on our business and financial results. Both our manufacturing of certain of our systems and NPI manufacturing of the ARTAS procedure kits are dependent upon third party suppliers and, in some cases, sole suppliers, for the majority of our comp1nts, subassemblies and materials, making us vulnerable to supply shortages and price fluctuations, which could harm our business. We and NPI, as the case may be, rely on several sole source suppliers, including Kuka Robotics, Inc., FLIR Integrated Imaging Solutions Inc. and 3D CAM International Corporation, for certain comp1nts of the ARTAS System, reusable procedure kits, disposable procedure kits and spare procedure kits. We also rely on other suppliers for some of the comp1nts used to manufacture our other devices. These suppliers may be unwilling or unable to supply comp1nts of these systems to us or NPI reliably and at the levels we anticipate or require to meet demand for our products. For us to be successful, our suppliers must be able to provide products and comp1nts in substantial quantities, in compliance with regulatory requirements, in accordance with agreed upon specifications, at acceptable costs and on a timely basis. An interruption in our commercial operations could occur if we encounter delays or difficulties in securing these comp1nts, and if we cannot then obtain an acceptable substitute. We source a number of comp1nts used in the manufacture of our systems from China and given the adverse effects on global supply chain caused by the COVID 19 pandemic, access to our existing supply chain may be become impaired, which could result in manufacturing delays and inventory shortages. If we are required to transition to new third party suppliers for certain comp1nts of our systems or our ARTAS procedure kits, we believe that there are only a few such suppliers that can supply the necessary comp1nts. A supply interruption, price fluctuation or an increase in demand beyond our current suppliers capabilities could harm our ability to manufacture our systems and NPI ability to manufacture our ARTAS procedure kits until new sources of supply are identified and qualified. In addition, the use of comp1nts or materials furnished by these alternative suppliers could require us to alter our operations. 45 Table of Contents In addition, our reliance on these suppliers subjects us to a number of risks that could harm our reputation, business, and financial condition, including, among other things, a lack of long term supply arrangements for key comp1nts with our suppliers, difficulty and cost associated with locating and qualifying alternative suppliers for our comp1nts in a timely manner, production delays related to the evaluation and testing of products from alternative suppliers, and corresponding regulatory qualifications, delay in delivery due to our suppliers prioritizing other customer orders over ours, damage to our reputation caused by defective comp1nts produced by our suppliers, and increased cost of our warranty program due to product repair or replacement based upon defects in comp1nts produced by our suppliers. Where practicable, we are seeking, or intending to seek, second source manufacturers for certain of our comp1nts. However, we cannot provide assurance that we will be successful in establishing second source manufacturers or that the second source manufacturers will be able to satisfy commercial demand for our systems. If any of these risks materialize, costs could significantly increase and our ability to meet demand for our products could be impacted. If we are unable to satisfy commercial demand for our systems in a timely manner, our ability to generate revenue from these systems would be impaired. If we are unable to manufacture our A RTAS iX System in high quality commercial quantities successfully and consistently to meet demand, our penetration of the hair restoration market will be limited, and our reputation could be harmed. To manufacture our ARTAS iX System in the quantities that we believe will be required to meet anticipated market demand, we will need to develop and maintain sufficient manufacturing capacity, which will involve significant challenges. Historically, we have not manufactured any of our other ARTAS System products in house or without the contract manufacturer involvement. We have been manufacturing the ARTAS iX System without a third party contract manufacturer involvement for over 2 years. The continuous development of commercial scale manufacturing capabilities will require us (or our contract manufacturer for ARTAS iX System, if we decide to utilize 1 on a long term basis) to invest substantial additional funds and hire and retain the technical personnel who have the necessary manufacturing experience. We also may become subject to additional, 1rous regulatory requirements from the U.S. regulatory agencies as well as foreign regulatory agencies. Neither we nor a third party manufacturer, if 1 is utilized, may successfully complete any required increase to existing manufacturing processes in a timely manner, or at all. If we or a contract manufacturer, if 1 is utilized, are unable to produce the ARTAS iX System in sufficient quantities to meet anticipated customer demand, our revenue, business, financial prospects, and reputation would be harmed. The limited experience we have, or a third party manufacturer may have, if 1 is utilized, in producing the ARTAS iX System may also result in quality issues, and possibly result in product recalls. Manufacturing delays related to quality control could harm our reputation and decrease our revenue. Any recall could be expensive and generate negative publicity, which could impair our ability to market the ARTAS iX System and procedures and further affect our results of operations. 46 Table of Contents Although we actively train our customers on the use of our systems and post treatment care, misuse by the operator of our systems may result in adverse medical events which may subject us to claims or otherwise harm our reputation and our business. We and our independent distributors market and sell our systems to physicians and other customers. In the United States and certain international markets, subject to local regulations, physician customers can generally allow nurse practiti1rs, technicians and other non physicians to perform aesthetic procedures using our systems under their direct supervision. Although we and our distributors provide training on the use of our systems as well as the proper post treatment care, we do not supervise the procedures performed with our systems, nor can we be certain that physicians are directly supervising procedures according to our recommendations. The potential misuse of our systems or failing to adhere to operating guidelines can cause skin damage and underlying tissue damage, which could harm the reputation of our systems and expose us to costly product liability litigation. In addition, patients may not comply with post treatment guidelines, which could also lead to adverse results and subject us to claims by patients. Product liability suits could be brought against us for defective design, labeling, material, workmanship, or software or misuse of our systems, and could result in expensive and time consuming litigation, payment of substantial damages, an increase in our insurance rates and substantial harm to our reputation. If our systems are defectively designed, manufactured, or labeled, contain defective comp1nts or software, or are misused, we may become subject to substantial and costly litigation by our customers or their patients. For example, if a patient is injured or suffers unanticipated adverse events after undergoing a procedure using 1 of our systems, or if system operating guidelines are found to be inadequate, we may be subject to product liability claims. Claims could also be asserted under state consumer protection acts. If we cannot successfully defend ourselves against product liability claims, we may incur substantial liabilities. Even successful defense would require significant financial and management resources. Regardless of the merits or eventual outcome, product liability claims may result in decreased demand for our systems, or any future systems or services; damage to our reputation; withdrawal of clinical trial participants; costs to defend the related litigation; a diversion of management time and our resources; substantial m1tary awards to customers, patients or clinical trial participants; regulatory investigations, product recalls, withdrawals or labeling, marketing or promotional restrictions; loss of revenue; and the inability to commercialize future products. 47 Table of Contents We currently have product liability insurance, but any claim that may be brought against us could result in a court judgment or settlement in an amount that is not covered, in whole or in part, by our insurance or that is in excess of the limits of our insurance coverage. Our insurance policies also have various exclusions and deductibles, and we may be subject to a product liability claim for which we have no coverage. We will have to pay any amounts awarded by a court or negotiated in a settlement that exceed our coverage limitations or that are not covered by our insurance, and we may not have, or be able to obtain, sufficient funds to pay such amounts. Moreover, in the future, we may not be able to maintain insurance coverage at a reasonable cost or in sufficient amounts to protect us against losses. Third parties may attempt to reverse engineer or produce counterfeit versions of our systems which may negatively affect our reputation, or harm patients and subject us to product liability claims. Third parties have sought in the past, and in the future may seek, to reverse engineer or develop counterfeit products that are substantially similar or compatible with our systems and available to practiti1rs at lower prices than our own. Practiti1rs may be able to make unauthorized use of our systems technology. In addition, if copies of products that have been reverse engineered or counterfeit products are used with or in place of our own, we could be subject to product liability claims resulting from the use of damaged or defective goods and suffer damage to our reputation. Security breaches and other disruptions could compromise our information and expose us to liability. In the ordinary course of our business and to the extent necessary, we rely on software to control the ongoing use of our systems, collect, and aggregate diagnostic data, and collect and store sensitive data, including intellectual property and proprietary business information, and certain personally identifiable information of customers, distributors, consultants and employees in our data centers and on our ne2rks. The secure processing, maintenance, and transmission of this information is important to our operations and business strategy. We have established physical, electronic, and policy measures to secure our systems in an attempt to prevent a system breach and the theft of data we collect, and we rely on commercially available systems, software, tools, and monitoring in our effort to provide security for our information technology systems and the digital information we collect, process, transmit and store. Despite our security measures, our information technology systems and related infrastructure, and those of our current and any future collaborators, contractors, and consultants and other third parties on which we rely, may be vulnerable to attacks by computer viruses, malware, hackers, or breaches due to malfeasance, employee or contractor error, telecommunication or electrical failures, terrorism or other created or natural disasters. Despite our cybersecurity measures, it is possible for security vulnerabilities to remain undetected for an extended time period, up to and including several years. While we have experienced, and expect to continue to experience, threats and disruptions to the Company information technology infrastructure, n1 of them to date has had a material impact to the Company. The costs to us to mitigate ne2rk security problems, bugs, viruses, worms, malicious software programs and security vulnerabilities could be significant, and while we have implemented security measures to protect our data security and information technology systems, our efforts to address these problems may not be successful, and these problems could result in unexpected interruptions, delays, cessation of service and other harm to our business and our competitive position. Moreover, if a computer security breach affects our systems or results in the unauthorized release of personally identifiable information, our reputation could be materially damaged. In addition, such a breach may require notification to governmental agencies, the media, or individuals pursuant to various federal and state privacy and security laws, if applicable, and may be subject to financial liability to the extent we are not in compliance with privacy laws to which we are subject at the time of a breach. We could also be exposed to a risk of loss or litigation and potential liability, which could materially adversely affect our business, results of operations and financial condition. The clinical trial process required to obtain regulatory clearances or approvals is lengthy and expensive with uncertain outcomes and could result in delays in new product introductions. In order to obtain 510(k) clearance for certain of our systems, we were required to conduct clinical trials, and we expect to conduct clinical trials in support of marketing authorization for future products and product enhancements. Conducting clinical trials is a complex and expensive process, can take many years, and outcomes are inherently uncertain. We may suffer significant setbacks in clinical trials, even after earlier pre clinical or clinical trials showed promising results, and failure can occur at any time during the clinical trial process. Any of our products may malfunction or may produce undesirable adverse effects that could cause us or regulatory authorities to interrupt, delay or halt clinical trials. We, the FDA, or another regulatory authority may suspend or terminate clinical trials at any time to avoid exposing trial participants to unacceptable health risks. 48 Table of Contents Successful results of pre clinical or feasibility studies are not necessarily indicative of future clinical trial results, and predecessor clinical trial results may not be replicated in subsequent clinical trials. Additionally, the FDA may disagree with our interpretation of the data from our pre clinical studies and clinical trials, or may find the clinical trial design, conduct or results inadequate to prove safety or efficacy, and may require us to pursue additional pre clinical studies or clinical trials, which could further delay the clearance or approval of our products. The data we collect from our pre clinical studies and clinical trials may not be sufficient to support the FDA clearance or approval, and if we are unable to demonstrate the safety and efficacy of our future products in our clinical trials, we will be unable to obtain regulatory clearance or approval to market our products. In addition, we may estimate and publicly announce the anticipated timing of the accomplishment of various clinical, regulatory and other product development goals, which are often referred to as milest1s. These milest1s could include the obtainment of the right to affix the CE Mark in the European Union; the submission to the FDA of an investigational device exemption, or IDE, application to commence a pivotal clinical trial for a new product; the enrollment of patients in clinical trials; the release of data from clinical trials; and other clinical and regulatory events. The actual timing of these milest1s could vary dramatically compared to our estimates, in some cases for reasons beyond our control. We cannot assure you that we will meet our projected milest1s and if we do not meet these milest1s as publicly announced, the commercialization of our products may be delayed and, as a result, our stock price may decline. Delays in the commencement or completion of clinical testing could significantly affect our product development costs. We do not know whether planned clinical trials will begin on time, need to be redesigned, enroll an adequate number of patients in a timely manner or be completed on schedule, if at all. The commencement and completion of clinical trials can be delayed or terminated for a number of reasons, including delays or failures related to the FDA or comparable foreign regulatory authorities disagreeing as to the level of risk, design or implementation of our clinical studies; obtaining regulatory approval to commence a clinical trial; reaching agreement on acceptable terms with prospective clinical research organizations, or CROs, and trial sites, the terms of which can be subject to extensive negotiation and may vary significantly among different CROs and trial sites; manufacturing sufficient quantities of a product for use in clinical trials; obtaining institutional review board, or IRB, or ethics committees approval to conduct a clinical trial at each prospective site; recruiting and enrolling patients and maintaining their participation in clinical trials; having clinical sites observe trial protocol or continue to participate in a trial; addressing any patient safety concerns that arise during the course of a clinical trial; addressing any conflicts with new or existing laws or regulations; and adding a sufficient number of clinical trial sites. Patient enrollment in clinical trials and completion of patient follow up depend on many factors, including the size of the patient population, the nature of the trial protocol, the proximity of patients to clinical sites, the eligibility criteria for the clinical trial, patient compliance, competing clinical trials and clinicians and patients perceptions as to the potential advantages of the product being studied in relation to other available therapies, including any new treatments that may be cleared or approved for the indications we are investigating. For example, patients may be discouraged from enrolling in our clinical trials if the trial protocol requires them to undergo extensive post treatment procedures or follow up to assess the safety and efficacy of a product, or they may be persuaded to participate in contemporaneous clinical trials of a competitor product. In addition, patients participating in our clinical trials may drop out before completion of the trial or suffer adverse medical events unrelated to our products. Delays in patient enrollment or failure of patients to continue to participate in a clinical trial may delay commencement or completion of the clinical trial, cause an increase in the costs of the clinical trial and delays, or result in the failure of the clinical trial. 49 Table of Contents We could also encounter delays if the FDA concluded that our financial relationships with our principal investigators resulted in a perceived or actual conflict of interest that may have affected the interpretation of a study, the integrity of the data generated at the applicable clinical trial site or the utility of the clinical trial itself. Principal investigators for our clinical trials may serve as scientific advisors or consultants to us from time to time and receive cash compensation and or stock options in connection with such services. If these relationships and any related compensation to or ownership interest by the clinical investigator carrying out the study result in perceived or actual conflicts of interest, or the FDA concludes that the financial relationship may have affected interpretation of the study, the integrity of the data generated at the applicable clinical trial site may be questi1d and the utility of the clinical trial itself may be jeopardized, which could result in the delay or rejection of our marketing application by the FDA. Any such delay or rejection could prevent us from commercializing any of our products in development. Furthermore, clinical trials may also be delayed because of ambiguous or negative interim results. In addition, a clinical trial may be suspended or terminated by us, the FDA, the IRB overseeing the clinical trial at issue, the Data Safety Monitoring Board for such trial, any of our clinical trial sites with respect to that site, or other regulatory authorities due to several factors, including failure to conduct the clinical trial in accordance with applicable regulatory requirements or our clinical protocols; inspection of the clinical trial operations or trial sites by the FDA or other regulatory authorities resulting in the imposition of a clinical hold; inability of a clinical investigator or clinical trial site to continue to participate in the clinical trial; unforeseen safety issues, governmental regulation or adverse side effects; failure to demonstrate a benefit from using the product; and lack of adequate funding to continue the clinical trial. Additionally, changes in regulatory requirements and guidance may occur and we may need to amend clinical trial protocols to reflect these changes. Amendments may require us to resubmit our clinical trial protocols to IRBs for reexamination, which may impact the costs, timing or successful completion of a clinical trial. If we experience delays in completion of, or if we terminate, any of our clinical trials, the commercial prospects for our products may be harmed and our ability to generate product revenue from these products will be delayed or not realized at all. In addition, any delays in completing our clinical trials will increase our costs, slow down our product development and approval process and jeopardize our ability to commence product sales and generate revenue. Any of these occurrences may significantly harm our business, financial condition and prospects significantly. In addition, many of the factors that cause, or lead to, a delay in the commencement or completion of a clinical trial may also ultimately lead to the denial of regulatory approval of the subject product. 50 Table of Contents Risks related to our ability to manufacture and or sell our products may be impaired by disruption to our manufacturing, warehousing or distribution capabilities, or to the capabilities of our suppliers, contract manufacturers, logistics service providers or independent distributors. The Company maintains manufacturing operations at its facilities in San Jose, California and Yokneam, Israel. We rely on third party suppliers and manufacturers in various countries to produce comp1nts and provide raw materials used in the manufacturing of our products. The COVID 19 pandemic has resulted in both worldwide shortage of raw materials and goods required for manufacturing of our products, as well as significant governmental measures implemented to control the spread of the virus, including, among others, restrictions on manufacturing and the movement of employees in many regions. As a result of COVID 19 and the measures designed to contain the spread of the virus, our third party suppliers and manufacturers may not have the materials, capacity, or capability to manufacture our products according to our schedule and specifications and we may need to seek alternate supply and or manufacturing sources, which may be more expensive. Alternate sources may not be available or may result in delays in shipments to us from our supply chain and subsequently to our customers, each of which would affect our results of operations. Risks Related to Intellectual Property If we are unable to obtain, maintain, retain and enforce adequate intellectual property rights covering our products and any future products we develop, others may be able to make, use, or sell products that are substantially the same as ours, which could adversely affect our ability to compete in the market. Our commercial success is dependent in part on obtaining, maintaining, retaining and enforcing our intellectual property rights, including our patents and the patents we exclusively license. If we are unable to obtain, maintain, retain and enforce sufficiently broad intellectual property protection covering our products and any other products we develop, others may be able to make, use, or sell products that are substantially the same as our products without incurring the sizeable development and licensing costs that we have incurred, which would adversely affect our ability to compete effectively in the market. We protect our proprietary information and technology through nondisclosure agreements, noncompetition covenants, and other contractual provisions and agreements, as well as through patent, trademark and trade secret laws in the United States and similar laws in other countries. These protections may not be available in all jurisdictions and may be inadequate to prevent our competitors or other third party manufacturers from copying, reverse engineering or otherwise obtaining and using our technology, proprietary rights or products. For example, the laws of certain countries in which our products are manufactured or licensed do not protect our proprietary rights to the same extent as the laws of the United States. In addition, third parties may seek to challenge, invalidate or circumvent our patents, trademarks or applications for any of the foregoing. We have focused patent, trademark, copyright and trade secret protection primarily in the United States and Europe, although we distribute our products globally. As a result, we may not have sufficient protection of our intellectual property in all countries where infringement may occur. There can be no assurance that our competitors will not independently develop technologies that are substantially equivalent or superior to our technology or design around our proprietary rights. In each case, our ability to compete could be significantly impaired. To prevent substantial unauthorized use of our intellectual property rights, it may be necessary to prosecute actions for infringement and or misappropriation of our proprietary rights against third parties. Any such action could result in significant costs and diversion of our resources and management attention, and we may not be successful in such action. We have obtained and maintained our existing patents, sought to diligently prosecute our existing patent applications, and sought to file patent applications and obtain additional patents and other intellectual property rights to restrict the ability of others to market products that compete with our current and future products. As of December 31, 2021, the Company patent portfolio was comprised of 12 issued U.S. patents, 8 pending U.S. patent applications, 23 issued foreign counterpart patents, and 9 pending foreign counterpart patent applications relating to the (MP)2, fractional RF and Directional Skin Tightening technology, 7 issued foreign patents covering the NeoGraft system and its methods of use, and 97 issued U.S. patents, 3 pending U.S. patent applications, 148 issued foreign counterpart patents, and 14 pending foreign counterpart patent applications relating to the ARTAS System and methods of use. However, patents may not be issued on any pending or future patent applications we file, the claims that issue may provide limited or no coverage of its products and technologies, and, moreover, issued patents owned or licensed to us now or in the future may be found by a court to be invalid or otherwise unenforceable at any time. We may choose to not apply for patent protection or may fail to apply for patent protection on important technologies or product candidates in a timely fashion. In addition, we may be unable to obtain patents necessary to protect our technology or products due to prior uses of or claims to similar processes or systems by third parties, or to blocking intellectual property owned by third parties. Even though we have issued patents, and even if additional patents are issued to us in the future, they may be challenged, narrowed, invalidated, held to be unenforceable or circumvented, which could limit our ability to prevent competitors from using similar technology or marketing similar products, or limit the length of time our technologies and products have patent protection. Also, even if our existing and future patents are determined to be valid and enforceable, they may not be drafted or interpreted broadly enough to prevent others from marketing products and services similar to ours, by easily designing products around our patents or otherwise developing competing products or technologies. In addition, the ownership or inventorship of 1 or more of our patents and patent applications may be challenged by 1 or more parties in 1 or more jurisdictions, including in a patent interference or a derivation proceeding in the United States Patent and Trademark Office ( USPTO ), or a similar foreign governmental agency or during the course of a litigation. If a competitor were able to successfully design around our patents, we may not be able to block such competition, and furthermore the competitor products may be more effective or commercially successful than its products. In addition, our current patents will eventually expire, or they may otherwise cease to provide meaningful competitive advantage, and we may be unable to adequately develop new technologies and obtain future patent protection to preserve our competitive advantage or avoid other adverse effects on our business. 51 Table of Contents We have a number of foreign patent applications, and while we generally try to pursue patent protection in the jurisdictions in which we do or intend to do significant business, the filing, prosecuting, maintaining and defending patents relating to our current or future products in all countries throughout the world would be prohibitively expensive. Furthermore, the laws of some foreign jurisdictions do not protect intellectual property rights to the same extent as laws in the U.S., and many companies have encountered significant difficulties in obtaining, protecting, and defending such rights in foreign jurisdictions. As a result, our intellectual property may not provide us with sufficient rights to exclude others from commercializing products similar or identical to its products in various jurisdictions. Competitors may use our technologies in jurisdictions where we have not obtained patent protection to develop their own products, and we may be unable to prevent such competitors from importing those infringing products into territories where we do not have patent protection or into territories where we do have patent protection but there is no prohibition against such importation, or even if such prohibitions exist, the law or related enforcement is not as strong as in the United States. These products may compete with our systems and our patents and our other intellectual property rights may not be effective or sufficient to prevent competitors from competing in those jurisdictions. If we encounter such difficulties or are otherwise precluded from effectively protecting and enforcing our intellectual property rights in foreign jurisdictions, our business prospects could be substantially harmed. Third party patent applications and patents could significantly reduce the scope of protection of patents owned by or licensed to us and limit our ability to obtain a meaningful scope of patent protection or market and sell our products or develop, market, and sell future products. In the United States, other parties may attack the validity of our patents after they issue, in a court proceeding, or in an ex parte reexamination proceeding or 1 or more post grant procedures that were authorized under the America Invents Act of 2011, that were available commencing on March 16, 2013 such as post grant review, covered business method review or inter partes review, in front of the Patent Trial and Appeal Board of the USPTO. The costs of these proceedings could be substantial. At any given time, we may be involved as either a plaintiff or a defendant in a number of patent infringement actions, the outcomes of which may not be known for prolonged periods of time. The large number of patents, the rapid rate of new patent applications and issuances, the complexities of the technologies involved, and the uncertainty of litigation significantly increase the risks related to any patent litigation. Any potential intellectual property litigation may (i) force us to withdraw existing products from the market or may be unable to commercialize 1 or more of our products, (ii) cause us to incur substantial costs, and (iii) could place a significant strain on our financial resources, divert the attention of management from our core business and harm our reputation. Even if resolved in our favor, litigation or other legal proceedings relating to intellectual property claims may cause us to incur significant expenses and could distract our technical and management personnel from their normal responsibilities. In addition, there could be public announcements of the results of hearings, motions or other interim proceedings or developments, and if securities analysts or investors perceive these results to be negative, it could have a material adverse effect on the price of our common stock. Finally, any uncertainties resulting from the initiation and continuation of any litigation could have a material adverse effect on our ability to raise the funds necessary to continue our operations. In addition, we may indemnify our customers, suppliers and international distributors against claims relating to the infringement of the intellectual property rights of third parties relating to our products, methods, and or manufacturing processes. Third parties may assert infringement claims against our customers, suppliers, or distributors. These claims may require us to initiate or defend protracted and costly litigation on behalf of our customers, suppliers, or distributors, regardless of the merits of these claims. If any of these claims succeed, we may be forced to pay damages on behalf of our customers, suppliers, or distributors or may be required to obtain licenses for the products they use. If we cannot obtain all necessary licenses on commercially reasonable terms, our customers may be forced to stop using our products, or our suppliers may be forced to stop providing us with products. 52 Table of Contents The legal determinations relating to patent rights afforded to companies in the medical technology and aesthetic product fields can be uncertain and involve complex legal, factual, and scientific questions, sometimes involving important legal principles which remain uncertain or unresolved, and such uncertainty could affect the outcome or intellectual property related legal determinations in which we are involved. Both the U.S. Supreme Court and the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Federal Circuit have made, and will likely continue to make, changes in how the patent laws of the United States are interpreted. Similarly, foreign courts have made, and will likely continue to make, changes in how the patent laws in their respective jurisdictions are interpreted. In addition, the U.S. Congress is currently considering legislation that would change certain provisions of U.S. federal patent law. We cannot predict future changes which U.S. and foreign courts may make in the interpretation of patent laws or changes to patent laws which might be enacted into law by U.S. and foreign legislative bodies. Those changes may materially affect our patent rights, and our ability to obtain patents in the future. Prosecution of patent applications, post grant opposition proceedings, and litigation to establish the validity, enforceability, and scope of patents, assert patent infringement claims against others or defend against patent infringement claims by others are expensive and time consuming. There can be no assurance that, in the event that claims of any of our patents are challenged by 1 or more third parties, any court or patent authority ruling on such challenge will determine that such patent claims are valid and enforceable. An adverse outcome in such litigation or post grant proceeding could cause us to lose associated patent rights and may have a material adverse effect on our business. We may not be able to adequately protect our intellectual property rights throughout the world. Filing, prosecuting and defending patents on our products in all countries throughout the world would be prohibitively expensive. The requirements for patentability may differ in certain countries, particularly developing countries, and the breadth of patent claims which are allowed can be inconsistent. In addition, the laws of some foreign countries may not protect our intellectual property rights to the same extent as laws in the United States. Consequently, we may not be able to prevent third parties from practicing our inventions in all countries outside the United States. Competitors may use our technologies in jurisdictions where we have not obtained patent protection to develop their own products and, furthermore, may export otherwise infringing products to territories in which we have patent protection that may not be sufficient to terminate infringing activities. We do not have patent rights in certain foreign countries in which a market may exist. Moreover, in foreign jurisdictions where we do have patent rights, proceedings to enforce such rights could result in substantial costs and divert our efforts and attention from other aspects of our business, could put our patents at risk of being invalidated or interpreted narrowly, and our patent applications at risk of not issuing. Additionally, such proceedings could provoke third parties to assert claims against us. We may not prevail in lawsuits that we initiate, and the damages or other remedies awarded, if any, may not be commercially meaningful. Thus, we may not be able to stop a competitor from marketing and selling in foreign countries products that are the same as or similar to our products, and our competitive position in the international market would be harmed. Unauthorized use of our intellectual property may have occurred or may occur in the future. Any reverse engineered or counterfeit products that purport to be our systems that are currently in the market or that may be introduced in the future may harm our reputation and our sale of products. Moreover, if we commence litigation to stop or prevent any unauthorized use of our technology that occurs from reverse engineering or counterfeiting of our products, or if we have to defend allegations of such unauthorized use of a third party technology, such litigation would be time consuming, force us to incur significant costs and divert our attention and the efforts of its management and other employees. We depend on certain technologies that are licensed to us. We do not control these technologies and any loss of our rights to them could prevent us from selling our products. Our rights to use the technology we license are subject to compliance with the terms of those licenses. In some cases, we do not control the prosecution, maintenance, or filing of the patents to which we hold licenses, or the enforcement of these patents against third parties. These patents and patent applications are not written by us or our advisors, and we did not have control over the drafting and prosecution. We cannot be certain that drafting and or prosecution of the licensed patents and patent applications by the licensors have been or will be conducted in compliance with applicable laws and regulations or will result in valid and enforceable patents and other intellectual property rights. 53 Table of Contents Our intellectual property agreements with third parties may be subject to disagreements over contract interpretation, which could narrow the scope of our rights to the relevant intellectual property or technology or increase our financial or other obligations to our licensors. Certain provisions in our intellectual property agreements may be susceptible to multiple interpretations. The resolution of any contract interpretation disagreement that may arise could affect the scope of our rights to the relevant intellectual property or technology or affect financial or other obligations under the relevant agreement, either of which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects. In addition, while it is our policy to require our employees and contractors who may be involved in the conception or development of intellectual property to execute agreements assigning such intellectual property to us, we may be unsuccessful in executing such an agreement with each party who in fact conceives or develops intellectual property that we regard as our own. Our assignment agreements may not be self executing or may be breached, and we may be forced to bring claims against third parties, or defend claims they may bring against us, to determine the ownership of what we regard as our intellectual property. If our trademarks and trade names are not adequately protected, then we may not be able to build name recognition in our markets of interest and our business may be adversely affected. We have trademark registrations and applications in the United States and also in certain foreign countries. Actions taken by us to establish and protect our trademarks might not prevent imitation of our products or services, infringement of our trademark rights by unauthorized parties or other challenges to our ownership or validity of our trademarks. If we are unable to register our trademarks, enforce our trademarks, or bar a third party from registering or using a trademark, our ability to establish name recognition based on our trademarks and compete effectively in our markets of interest may be adversely affected. In addition, our enforcement against third party infringers or violators may be expensive and time consuming, and the outcome is unpredictable and may not provide an adequate remedy. We may become subject to claims for remuneration for service invention rights by our employees, which could result in litigation and adversely affect our business. A significant portion of our intellectual property has been developed by our employees based in Israel in the course of their employment for Venus Ltd. Under the Israeli Patent Law, 5727 1967 (the Patent Law ), inventions conceived by employees during and within the scope of employment with an employer are regarded as service inventions, which belong to the employer, absent a specific agreement between the employee and employer giving the employee service invention rights. The Patent Law also provides that if there is no agreement between an employer and an employee with respect to the employee right to receive compensation for such service inventions, the Israeli Compensation and Royalties Committee, a body constituted under the Patent Law, shall determine whether the employee is entitled to remuneration for his or her service inventions and the scope and conditions for remuneration. While our employees have generally explicitly waived their right to any additional compensation for their contribution to service invention rights, certain current or former employees may not have signed such waivers, and we may face claims from current or former employees demanding remuneration in consideration for their contribution to service invention rights, which may lead to future litigation, which could be costly and could divert management attention and we could be required to pay such remuneration. 54 Table of Contents Risks Related to Government Regulation Our devices and our operations are subject to extensive government regulation and oversight both in the United States and abroad, and our failure to comply with applicable requirements could harm our business. Certain of our systems are regulated as medical devices subject to extensive regulation in the United States and elsewhere, including by the FDA and its foreign counterparts. The FDA and foreign regulatory agencies regulate, among other things, with respect to medical devices design, development and manufacturing; testing, labeling, content and language of instructions for use and storage; clinical trials; product safety; marketing, sales and distribution; premarket clearance and approval; record keeping procedures; advertising and promotion; recalls and field safety corrective actions; post market surveillance, including reporting of deaths or serious injuries and malfunctions that, if they were to recur, could lead to death or serious injury; post market approval studies; and product import and export. The regulations to which we are subject are complex and have tended to become more stringent over time. Regulatory changes could result in restrictions on our ability to carry on or expand our operations, higher than anticipated costs or lower than anticipated sales. In the United States, before we can market a new medical device, or a new use of, new claim for or significant modification to an existing product, we must first receive either clearance under Section 510(k) of the FDCA or approval of a PMA application from the FDA, unless an exemption applies. We consider our Venus Glow and NeoGraft systems exempt from the FDA 510(k) clearance requirement. We have obtained 510(k) clearance from the FDA for Venus Concept Venus Viva, Venus Viva MD, Venus Legacy, Venus Versa, Venus Velocity, Venus Bliss, Venus Bliss Max, Venus Epileve, Venus Fiore, ARTAS and ARTAS iX Systems. In the 510(k) clearance process, before a device may be marketed, the FDA must determine that a proposed device is substantially equivalent to a legally marketed predicate device, which includes a device that has been previously cleared through the 510(k) process, a device that was legally marketed prior to May 28, 1976 (pre amendments device), a device that was originally on the United States. market pursuant to a PMA application and later down classified, or a 510(k) exempt device. If a product is not eligible for 510(k) clearance it may require approval of a de novo reclassification petition or a PMA. Both the PMA approval and the 510(k) clearance process can be expensive, lengthy and uncertain. The FDA 510(k) clearance process usually takes from 3 to 12 months but can take longer. For products subject to PMA, the regulatory process generally takes from 1 to 3 years or even longer, from the time the application is filed with the FDA and involves substantially greater risks and commitment of resources than either the 510(k) clearance or de novo processes. We may not be able to obtain necessary regulatory approvals or clearances on a timely basis, if at all, for any of our products under development, and delays in receipt of, or failure to receive such approvals or clearances could have a material adverse effect on our business. The FDA and other regulatory authorities policies may change, and additional government regulations may be enacted that could prevent, limit or delay regulatory approval of our products. If we are slow or unable to adapt to changes in existing requirements or the adoption of new requirements or policies, or if we are not able to maintain regulatory compliance, we may fail to obtain any marketing clearances or approvals, lose any marketing clearance or approval that we may have obtained, and we may not achieve or sustain profitability. 55 Table of Contents We also cannot predict the likelihood, nature or extent of government regulation that may arise from future legislation or administrative action, either in the United States or abroad. Even after we have obtained the proper regulatory clearance or approval to market a product, we have ongoing responsibilities under the FDA regulations. The failure to comply with applicable regulations could jeopardize our ability to sell our systems and result in enforcement actions such as fines, injunctions, civil penalties, recalls or seizure of products, withdrawal of current clearances, and refusal of future clearances. Any of these sanctions could result in higher than anticipated costs or lower than anticipated sales and harm our reputation, business, financial condition and results of operations. We are subject to extensive governmental regulation in foreign jurisdictions, such as Europe, and our failure to comply with applicable requirements could cause our business to suffer. We must maintain regulatory approval in foreign jurisdictions in which we plan to market and sell our systems. In the EEA, for example, manufacturers of medical devices need to comply with the Essential Requirements laid down in Annex II to the EU Medical Devices Directive (Council Directive 93 42 EEC) and the EU Medical Device Regulation 2017 747 (MDR) which is replacing the EU Medical Devices Directive. Compliance with these requirements is a prerequisite to be able to affix the CE mark to medical devices, without which they cannot be marketed or sold in the EEA. With respect to active implantable medical devices or Class III devices, the manufacturer must conduct clinical studies to obtain the required clinical data, unless reliance on existing clinical data from equivalent devices can be justified. The conduct of clinical studies in the EEA is governed by detailed regulatory obligations. These may include the requirement of prior authorization by the competent authorities of the country in which the study takes place and the requirement to obtain a positive opinion from a competent Ethics Committee. This process can be expensive and time consuming. 56 Table of Contents We are subject to governmental regulation and other legal obligations, particularly related to privacy and data security, which are complex and rapidly changing. Our actual or perceived failure to comply with such obligations could harm our business. We are subject to diverse laws and regulations relating to data privacy and security, both in the United States and internationally. New global privacy rules are being enacted and existing 1s are being updated and strengthened. Complying with these numerous, complex and often changing regulations is expensive and difficult, and failure to comply with any privacy laws or data security laws or any security incident or breach involving the misappropriation, loss or other unauthorized access or disclosure of sensitive or confidential patient or consumer information, whether by us, 1 of our business associates or another third party, could have a material adverse effect on our business, reputation, financial condition and results of operations, including but not limited to material fines and penalties; damages; litigation; consent orders; and injunctive relief. The regulation of data privacy and security, and the protection of the confidentiality of personal information, is increasing and continues to evolve in many of the jurisdictions in which we operate. For example, California has enacted the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA) as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act (CPRA), which create new individual privacy rights for consumers (as that word is broadly defined in the law) and employees and places increased privacy and security obligations on entities handling personal data of consumers and employees. The CCPA went into effect on January 1, 2020 and requires covered companies to provide new disclosures to California consumers, provides such consumers with ways to exercise new rights including the right to opt out of certain sharing of personal information, and allows consumers to bring private actions based on data breaches. Other states, such as Virginia and Colorado, have also adopted comprehensive consumer privacy laws at the state level. In the United States at the federal level, the Federal Trade Commission has brought legal actions against organizations that are alleged to have violated consumers privacy rights, or misled them by failing to maintain security for sensitive consumer information, or caused substantial consumer injury. In many of these cases, the FTC has charged the defendants with violating Section 5 of the FTC Act, which bars unfair and deceptive acts and practices in or affecting commerce. In addition to the FTC Act, the agency also enforces other federal laws relating to consumers privacy and security. In addition, federal and state breach notification laws may require us to notify individuals, federal and state agencies, or the media if we suffer a privacy or security breach incident involving personally identifiable information. Proposals for additional privacy and security laws are being considered at both the federal and state level, and could be enacted in the future. Modifications to our products may require new regulatory clearances or approvals or expansion of the scope of our CE Certificates of Conformity with our notified body. Modifications to our products may require new regulatory clearances or approvals from the FDA or other regulatory authorities or expansion of the scope of our CE Certificates of Conformity with our notified body. Even after achieving the initial market clearance, or approval from the FDA or other regulatory authorities or having affixed the CE marked to a product, modifications to our systems during their life cycles may require new regulatory approvals or clearances, including 510(k) clearances, premarket approvals, the conduct of a new conformity assessment with our notified body, or foreign regulatory approvals. Obtaining a new 510(k), other regulatory clearances and approvals, or a revised or new CE Certificate of Conformity can be a time consuming process, and we may not be able to obtain such clearances or approvals in a timely manner, or at all. We are subject to restrictions on the indications for which we are permitted to market our products, and any violation of those restrictions, or marketing of systems for off label uses, could subject us to enforcement action. Our promotional materials and training methods must comply with FDA and other applicable laws and regulations, including the prohibition of the promotion of off label use in both the United States and in foreign countries. The use of 1 of our systems for indications other than those cleared by the FDA or approved by any foreign regulatory body may not effectively treat such conditions, which could harm our reputation in the marketplace among physicians and patients. If the FDA or any foreign regulatory body determines that our promotional materials or training constitute promotion of an off label use, it could request that we modify our training or promotional materials or subject us to regulatory or enforcement actions, including, among other things, the issuance or imposition of an untitled letter, a warning letter, injunction, seizure, refusal to issue new 510(k)s or PMAs, withdrawal of existing 510(k)s or PMAs, refusal to grant export approvals, and civil fines or criminal penalties. 57 Table of Contents Our systems may cause or contribute to adverse medical events that we are required to report to the FDA, and if we fail to do so, we would be subject to sanctions that could harm our reputation, business, financial condition and results of operations. The FDA medical device reporting regulations require us to report to the FDA when we receive or become aware of information that reasonably suggests that 1 of our systems may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury or malfuncti1d in a way that, if the malfunction were to recur, it could cause or contribute to a death or serious injury. If we fail to comply with our reporting obligations, the FDA could act, including warning letters, untitled letters, administrative actions, criminal prosecution, imposition of civil m1tary penalties, revocation of our device clearance, seizure of our products or delay in clearance of future products. The FDA, state regulating agencies at times, and foreign regulatory bodies have the authority to require the recall of commercialized products in the event of material deficiencies or defects in design or manufacture of a product or if a product poses an unacceptable risk to health. The FDA authority to require a recall must be based on a finding that there is reasonable probability that the device could cause serious injury or death. We may also choose to voluntarily recall a product if any material deficiency is found. A government mandated or voluntary recall by us could occur because of an unacceptable risk to health, comp1nt failures, malfunctions, manufacturing defects, labeling or design deficiencies, packaging defects or other deficiencies or failures to comply with applicable regulations. We have received inquiries from regulatory agencies regarding post market safety concerns in the past. We cannot assure you that product defects or other errors will not occur in the future. Recalls involving any of our systems could be particularly harmful to our business, financial condition, and results of operations because it is our only product. If we or our distributors do not obtain and maintain international regulatory registrations or approvals for our systems, our ability to market and sell our systems outside of the United States will be diminished. Sale of our systems, outside the United States are subject to foreign regulatory requirements that vary widely from country to country. In addition, the FDA regulates exports of medical devices from the United States. While the regulations of some countries may not impose barriers to marketing and selling certain of our systems or only require notification, others require that we or our distributors obtain the approval of a specified regulatory body. Complying with foreign regulatory requirements, including obtaining registrations or approvals, can be expensive and time consuming, and we cannot be certain that we or our distributors will receive regulatory approvals in each country in which we plan to market a particular system or that we will be able to do so on a timely basis. The time required to obtain registrations or approvals, if required by other countries, may be longer than that required for the FDA clearance, and requirements for such registrations, clearances, or approvals may significantly differ from FDA requirements. If we modify our systems, we or our distributors may need to apply for additional regulatory approvals or other authorizations before we are permitted to sell the modified product. In addition, we may not continue to meet the quality and safety standards required to maintain the authorizations that we or our distributors have received. If we or our distributors are unable to maintain our authorizations in a particular country, we will no longer be able to sell the applicable product in that country, which could harm our business. Regulatory clearance or approval by the FDA does not ensure clearance or approval by regulatory authorities in other countries, and clearance or approval by 1 or more foreign regulatory authorities does not ensure clearance or approval by regulatory authorities in other foreign countries or by the FDA. However, a failure or delay in obtaining regulatory clearance or approval in 1 country may have a negative effect on the regulatory process in others. 58 Table of Contents Our ability to continue manufacturing and supplying our products depends on our continued adherence to ongoing FDA and other foreign regulatory authority manufacturing requirements. Our manufacturing processes and facilities are required to comply with the quality management system regulations of its target markets (i.e., the QSR, ISO 134852016, and the MDSAP). Adherence to quality management system regulations and the effectiveness of our quality management control systems are periodically assessed through internal audits and inspections of manufacturing facilities by regulatory authorities. Failure to comply with applicable quality management system requirements, or later discovery of previously unknown problems with our products or manufacturing processes, including our failure or the failure of our third party manufacturer to take satisfactory corrective action in response to an adverse quality system inspection, can result in enforcement action, which could have an adverse effect on our business. Our manufacturing process and facilities are audited annually for compliance with the last editions of QSR, ISO13485 and MDSAP requirements. The FDA inspected our San Jose facility in January 2020, which audit resulted in 2 observations. We responded to the FDA in February 2020 and the effectiveness of our actions will be determined during our next inspection. Regulating agencies, including the FDA, foreign regulatory authorities, and our notified body can institute a wide variety of enforcement actions, ranging from inspectional observations to more severe sanctions such as untitled letters or warning letters; clinical holds; administrative or judicially imposed sanctions; injunctions, fines, consent decrees, or the imposition of civil penalties; customer notifications for repair, replacement, or refunds; recall, detention, or seizure of products; operating restrictions, or total or partial suspension of production or distribution; refusal by the FDA, a foreign regulatory authority or the notified body to grant pending future clearance or pre market approval, or to issue CE Certificates of Conformity for our devices; debarment of us or our employees; withdrawal or suspension of marketing clearances, approvals, and CE Certificates of Conformity; refusal to permit the import or export of our products; and criminal prosecution of us or our employees. If any of these actions were to occur, it would harm our reputation and cause our system sales and profitability to suffer and may prevent us from generating revenue. Furthermore, our key comp1nt suppliers may not currently be or may not continue to be in compliance with all applicable regulatory requirements, which could result in the failure to produce our devices on a timely basis and in the required quantities, if at all. 59 Table of Contents We may be affected by healthcare policy changes and evolving regulations. Our global regulatory environment is becoming increasingly stringent and unpredictable, which could increase the time, cost and complexity of obtaining regulatory approvals for our products, as well as the clinical and regulatory costs of supporting those approvals. We must also devote significant time to monitoring developments and changes to ensure our compliance with the various applicable regulations and required approvals. For example, several countries that did not have regulatory requirements for medical devices have established such requirements in recent years and other countries have expanded on existing regulations. Certain regulators are exhibiting less flexibility and are requiring local preclinical and clinical data in addition to global data. While harmonization of global regulations has been pursued, requirements continue to differ significantly among countries. We expect this global regulatory environment will continue to evolve, which could impact our ability to obtain future approvals for our products or could increase the cost and time to obtain such approvals in the future. Risks Related to Our Operations in Israel We conduct a significant portion of our operations in Israel and therefore our business, financial condition and results of operations may be adversely affected by political, economic and military conditions in Israel. Our research and development facilities and key third party suppliers are located in northern Israel, and some of our key employees are residents of Israel. Accordingly, political, economic and military conditions in Israel may directly affect our business. Any hostilities, armed conflicts, terrorist activities or political instability involving Israel or the interruption or curtailment of trade within Israel or between Israel and its trading partners could adversely affect business conditions and have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations and could make it more difficult for us to raise capital. In addition, hostilities, armed conflicts, terrorist activities or political instability involving Israel could have a material adverse effect on our facilities including our corporate administrative office or on the facilities of our local suppliers, in which event all or a portion of our inventory may be damaged and our ability to deliver products to customers could be significantly delayed. Several countries, principally in the Middle East, restrict doing business with Israel and Israeli companies, and additional countries may impose restrictions on doing business with Israel and Israeli companies whether as a result of hostilities in the region or otherwise. While these restrictions are loosening and countries previously barred from doing business with Israel are eliminating these restrictions, to the extent they still exist, these restrictions may limit our revenues. Our commercial insurance does not cover losses that may occur as a result of events associated with the security situation in the Middle East, such as damages to our facilities resulting in disruption of our operations. Any losses or damages incurred by us could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Any armed conflicts or political instability in the region would likely negatively affect business conditions and could harm our business, financial condition and results of operations. 60 Table of Contents Risks Related to Our Common Stock The market price of our stock price may be volatile, and you may not be able to resell shares of our common stock at or above the price you paid. The market price of our common stock could be subject to significant fluctuations. Some of the factors that may cause the market price of the Company common stock to fluctuate include introduction of new products, services or technologies, significant contracts, commercial relationships or capital commitments by competitors; failure to meet or exceed financial and development projections the Company may provide to the public; failure to meet or exceed the financial and development projections of the investment community; announcements of significant acquisitions, strategic collaborations, joint ventures or capital commitments by the Company or its competitors; disputes or other developments relating to proprietary rights, including patents, litigation matters, and our ability to obtain patent protection for our technologies; additions or departures of key personnel; significant lawsuits or government investigations, including patent or stockholder litigation; if securities or industry analysts do not publish research or reports about the Company business, or if they issue adverse or misleading opinions regarding our business and stock; changes in the market valuations of similar companies; general market or macroeconomic conditions; sales of common stock by us or our stockholders in the future; trading volume of our common stock; adverse publicity relating to hair restoration or other minimally invasive or non invasive medical aesthetic procedures generally, including with respect to other products in such markets; the introduction of technological innovations that compete with the products and services of the Company; and period to period fluctuations in the Company financial results. In addition, the stock markets in general, and the markets for medical device and aesthetic stocks in particular, have experienced extreme volatility that may have been unrelated to the operating performance of the issuer. These broad market fluctuations may adversely affect the market price or liquidity of our common stock. 61 Table of Contents We are an emerging growth company and a smaller reporting company within the meaning of the 1933 Act and we have taken advantage of certain exemptions from disclosure requirements available to emerging growth companies and smaller reporting companies; this could make our securities less attractive to investors and may make it more difficult to compare our performance with other public companies. We qualify as, an emerging growth company within the meaning of the 1933 Act, as modified by the Jumpstart Our Business Startups Act (the JOBS Act ). We have taken advantage of certain exemptions from various reporting requirements that are applicable to other public companies that are not emerging growth companies or smaller reporting companies including, but not limited to, not being required to comply with the auditor attestation requirements of Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes Oxley Act, reduced disclosure obligations regarding executive compensation in our periodic reports and proxy statements and exemptions from the requirements of holding a nonbinding advisory vote on certain executive compensation matters and reduced reporting periods. As a result, stockholders may not have access to certain information they may deem important. We cannot predict whether investors will find our securities less attractive because we rely on these exemptions. If some investors find the securities less attractive as a result of reliance on these exemptions, the trading prices of our securities may be lower than they otherwise would be, there may be a less active trading market for our securities and the trading prices of our securities may be more volatile. Further, Section 102(b)(1) of the JOBS Act exempts emerging growth companies from complying with new or revised financial accounting standards until private companies (that is, those that have not had a 1933 Act registration statement declared effective or do not have a class of securities registered under the Exchange Act) are required to comply with the new or revised financial accounting standards. The JOBS Act provides that an emerging growth company can elect to opt out of the extended transition period and comply with the requirements that apply to non emerging growth companies but any such an election to opt out is irrevocable. We have elected not to opt out of such extended transition period. Accordingly, when a standard is issued or revised and it has different application dates for public or private companies, we, as an emerging growth company, could adopt the new or revised standard at the time private companies adopt the new or revised standard, unless early adoption is permitted by the standard. We intend to continue to use private company adoption dates for ASC 842, Leases. This may make comparison of us with another public company which is neither an emerging growth company nor an emerging growth company which has opted out of using the extended transition period difficult or impossible because of the potential differences in accounting standards used. 62 Table of Contents We do not intend to pay dividends on our common stock, and, consequently, our stockholders ability to achieve a return on their investment will depend on appreciation in the price of our common stock. We do not intend to pay any cash dividends on our common stock for the foreseeable future. We intend to invest our future earnings, if any, to fund our growth. Payment of future cash dividends, if any, will be at the discretion of the board of directors, subject to applicable law and will depend on various factors, including our financial condition, operating results, current and anticipated cash needs, the requirements of current or then existing debt instruments and other factors the board of directors deems relevant. Therefore, our stockholders are not likely to receive any dividends on their common stock for the foreseeable future. Since we do not intend to pay dividends, our stockholders ability to receive a return on their investment will depend on any future appreciation in the market value of our common stock. There is no guarantee that our common stock will appreciate or even maintain the price at which our stockholders have purchased it. The terms of our credit facilities limit our ability to pay dividends. Provisions in our charter documents and under Delaware law could make an acquisition more difficult and may discourage any takeover attempts our stockholders may consider favorable, and may lead to entrenchment of management. Provisions of our amended and restated certificate of incorporation and amended and restated bylaws could delay or prevent changes in control or changes in management without the consent of the board of directors. These provisions will include the following a classified board of directors with 3 year staggered terms, which may delay the ability of stockholders to change the membership of a majority of the board of directors; no cumulative voting in the election of directors, which limits the ability of minority stockholders to elect director candidates; the exclusive right of the board of directors to elect a director to fill a vacancy created by the expansion of the board of directors or the resignation, death or removal of a director, which prevents stockholders from being able to fill vacancies on the board of directors; the ability of the board of directors to authorize the issuance of shares of preferred stock and to determine the price and other terms of those shares, including preferences and voting rights, without stockholder approval, which could be used to significantly dilute the ownership of a hostile acquirer; the ability of the board of directors to alter its bylaws without obtaining stockholder approval; the required approval of at least 66 2 3 % of the shares entitled to vote at an election of directors to adopt, amend or repeal its bylaws or repeal the provisions of the amended and restated certificate of incorporation regarding the election and removal of directors; a prohibition on stockholder action by written consent, which forces stockholder action to be taken at an annual or special meeting of the stockholders; the requirement that a special meeting of stockholders may be called only by the chairman of the board of directors, the chief executive officer, the president or the board of directors, which may delay the ability of the stockholders to force consideration of a proposal or to act, including the removal of directors; and advance notice procedures that stockholders must comply with in order to nominate candidates to the board of directors or to propose matters to be acted upon at a stockholders meeting, which may discourage or deter a potential acquirer from conducting a solicitation of proxies to elect the acquirer own slate of directors or otherwise attempting to obtain control of the Company. These provisions would apply even we were to receive an offer that some stockholders may consider beneficial. We are also subject to the anti takeover provisions contained in Section 203 of the Delaware General Corporation Law ( Section 203 ). Under Section 203, a corporation may not, in general, engage in a business combination with any holder of 15% or more of its capital stock unless the holder has held the stock for 3 years or, among other exceptions, the board of directors has approved the transaction. 63 Table of Contents Our executive officers, directors and certain of our shareholders who are affiliated with our directors will have the ability to control or significantly influence all matters submitted to our stockholders for approval. As of December 31, 2021, our executive officers, directors and certain of our shareholders who are affiliated with our directors, in the aggregate, beneficially own approximately 39% of our outstanding shares of common stock. As a result, if these stockholders were to choose to act together, they would be able to control or significantly influence all matters submitted to our stockholders for approval, as well as our management and affairs. For example, if they choose to act together, these persons would control or significantly influence the election of directors and approval of any merger, consolidation or sale of all or substantially all of our assets. This concentration of voting power could delay or prevent an acquisition of the Company on terms that other stockholders may desire. General Risk Factors An active market for our common stock may not be maintained. Our stock began trading on the Nasdaq Global Market in July 2017, but we can provide no assurance that we will be able to maintain an active trading market on the Nasdaq Global Market or any other exchange in the future. If an active market for our common stock does not develop or is not maintained, it may be difficult for our stockholders to sell shares without depressing the market price for the shares or at all. An inactive trading market may also impair our ability to raise capital by selling shares and may impair our ability to acquire other businesses, applications, or technologies using our shares as consideration. 64 Table of Contents If we sell shares of our common stock in future financings, stockholders may experience immediate dilution and, as a result, our stock price may decline. We may from time to time issue additional shares of common stock at a discount from the current market price of our common stock. As a result, our stockholders would experience immediate dilution upon the purchase of any shares of our common stock sold at such discount. In addition, as opportunities present themselves, we may enter into financing or similar arrangements in the future, including the issuance of debt securities, preferred stock or common stock. If we issue common stock or securities convertible into common stock, our common stockholders would experience additional dilution and, as a result, our stock price may decline. Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments. N1 Item 2 Item 2 Properties.
